VeChain Foundation Climate Research with Justin Goldston and Linda Dunn of Georgetown University

Video Link - https://youtu.be/r7Fa19FVdPk

00:20
Sure. Thank you, Justin. Thanks for having me here today. So, as Justin said, I'm Linda done. And I'm the faculty director for the supply chain management master's program at Georgetown University and School of Continuing Studies.

00:37
Thanks for Thanks for that. So. So at Georgetown, do you all do any they will do anything in the area of, of sustainability? And, you know, carbon emissions and carbon tracking? or what have you? What have you seen in that in that particular area?

00:55
Yeah, there's, first of all, just supply chain, there's tremendous interest in this area. Right. And I would say that the program at Georgetown, and you know, this, from some background, right, is very focused on corporate social responsibility. So both from an environmental impacts, and also social impacts, you know, how, how does the supply chain play a role? And how can we improve both the environment and the social impacts using supply chain thinking about supply chain. So really, that that is a major focus. And I'd say the university overall has done a lot of things and published it, you know, with green energy, just to focus on sustainability overall. And that's really a part of, you know, taking care of others in the world, sort of the Jesuit values that they have.

01:54
Excellent. So, so I'm no arch. So for full disclosure, I teach within the program at George at Georgetown as well. So, so here's, that's, that's one of the reasons why, you know, some of the questions will come up. That's gonna come up later on. But I know that you you have you have some some background in in blockchain. And I know that we talk about how to integrate blockchain within the industry, namely within the supply chain space. So how do you how do you see us leveraging this technology to make an impact from a carbon tracking perspective?

02:39
Sure, Justin, I think you know, anything that really needs to be proven, so to speak, is going to be a place where blockchain may play a role. And so right now, there's a lot of claims in sustainability. I'll even diverge just from carbon for a minute. But you know, just sustainability practices. We talk about greenwashing, what's real, what's not? As many companies are so focused on, you know, zero carbon or pledges and, you know, what can they do? And how do they measure, you know, really scope three, which is the hard part, which is the one more supply chain is involved, right? They're going to need to prove it. And they're going to need to do it in a way that they don't have to keep doing the same auditing, so to speak. That's the biggest issue right now is both the measurement, but then also the certification. And that's where I think blockchain will play a role with the certification. You know, it is hard to measure. There's a lot, you know, people don't have necessarily all the same definitions, when they even talk zero carbon. What about embedded carbon, you know, in the construction industry, and once it's already there. And so, once the measurement and the definitions start to form, at least, you know, stage one of it because I think it will continually be refined, someone has to be able to certify that. So there's a lot of groups out there now, similar to when Sarbanes Oxley came out. And you really with GAP had to prove beyond a reasonable doubt, right? Someone had to sign off on it, that the financials were correct, indeed. And so with all that, that proving that which is where I think we are with carbon right now, then there's the audit statement, right. And for the most part, they're just doing an overall company. Here's the audit for the company. I think when you start to get with carbon, it's going to be by product. And to do that you don't want to do it again. And again, and again, you want to say I know the carbon footprint. And it might be that we actually have two pieces. This is the piece, you know, basically, before freight. Right, here's the piece, you know, this is what it is. And then there's a second piece that's associated with freight that might change for where the product is going. But the actual development and manufacture of the product and all the tier two, tier three suppliers, the measurement of that is all put on a blockchain, it's certified, you can prove that with customer, A, B, and C, because, again, you have 1000s of customers who want the same information. You can't you can't do each one separately, right. And so I think, because it's going to be at a product basis, instead of just a company, you're going to need a way to have that audit, have it certified and be able to each time present it. And I say you may separate freight, because obviously products can be moved all around the world. So there's to me there, it's almost like when you have a price in supply chain, right? And it's without the freight, you know, and then you add on the freight. So I think you might have the same thing. Here's the carbon measurement, here's the blockchain that proves it. And then there might be another one that gets generated with the freight. Just an ideas.

06:32
I love it. I love it. And so I know that we're big, we're big on this, you know, we hope that this is the utopian view, you know, of this space. But so given the given the kind of the, the, the rails of this of this study, you know, in terms of desirability, and feasibility given that you spend a lot of time in this space, given a lot of time at Aspen, I put time into space, what do you think the desirability is for a solution like this for those in the industry? Yeah, that's I know, that's a broad statement. But you know, think of the trucking companies think of those that do that do accidentally think of those that are there that they're they're just permanently focused on money? Right, you know, what's what, in your opinion, was the desirability or something like this?

07:26
I think the desirability is going to differ by industry a little bit, and it's going to differ by, you know, what's your role in the supply chain? So I think manufacturers first and foremost are going to be the most interested, just based on size, based on margin that they make. And, you know, those that have the ability, again, that don't want to replicate? Yes, this product has this carbon footprint, right? And this has has this level, I think you're gonna see it first in the manufacturing base, because it's natural there. After that, when you start to get to trucking companies, etc, that adoption would be afterwards, from my opinion, only because the margins for those types of companies tend to be thinner, right? It's like technology, where does that get any technology gets adopted, usually in industries that are have larger players and have better margins, that's, that's, you know, because they have the ability to put that in without hurting their p&l. And as a matter of fact, as it becomes required, I think the manufacturers will again, see blockchain as a way to implement something without having the repetitive cost, okay, it's gonna cost me I have to get audited, but it's one time. So that will be the savings from their perspective. The industries like trucking, and again, maritime will come along over time. And again, maritime may be faster. But even, you know, they've made a lot of money of recent, but there's been times in the past where they haven't made as much money either. So transportation itself is just got smaller margins. It's got more independent players, smaller players. And so again, I think it'll start with the manufacturing. And then eventually as costs come down, it gets normalized, the data is being exchanged, then it can move to the transportation sector, not that there won't be any transportation companies focused on blockchain and their carbon footprint there will be I just we have to recognize there's lots of independence there's lots of different players, and the margins are different than some of the you know, well, brand name known companies. So

10:01
Okay, excellent. So, so based on so based on, based on what we discussed, what do you think the feasibility would be? And if you do think it's feasible? How long do you think that it would take for Godot, there's gonna be a phased approach where it might be the larger organizations, you know, adopting it, then you have the small and medium organizations. You know, how long do you think it would take? If you think it's feasible?

10:35
Very good question. I don't have the crystal ball, you know, I would assume that you're looking, you know, five years out for manufacturers. Part of the issue, when you look at just the carbon measurement is the lack of agreement on how to measure. So that is going to take another year to two years, just to get people on the same page, you know, what does an audit look like? And maybe one to two years is, is actually optimistic. No one likes, you know, the standard better than their own standard, right. So the idea of countries coming together, and of their being uniformity, you know, how long will that take, what I'm hoping is, we at least come to some basic principles that would allow for measurement, with an understanding that it would be refined, like anything else, and it may have certain amount of allocations to it that isn't necessarily ideal. But you know, if you're making, you know, if you have any product, the core ingredient could be good going into multiple things. So, you know, I think before you were talking briefly about a cow, we are talking about a cow, but, you know, different pieces of that cow are used different ways, right? Sometimes for me, sometimes for the hide, it could be, you know, different uses, and so all products and that, too. So what's it being used for, right? And so there has to be some amount, it's like, overhead cost, you're going to have some amount of allocations that have to happen as part of this. If there can be agreement on how those get done, what's reasonable methodologies, then you're going to talk about the blockchain really being able to come in and be that verification piece. So I'm thinking, three to five years. And that may seem long, but it takes a long time for adoption. And again, it's going to be the big companies, and then the smaller ones over time. Right. And, you know, I think with anything that costs, you know, this will, the big issue will also be how much does this cost? Right? So as costs go down, then it becomes more and more feasible, and the timeline may move up. But that is always it has to have an ROI. People aren't going to do something unless there is a return on the money. They're investing in it. Yep,

13:16
I think, yeah, I think that's the big I think that's the big hang up, in terms of in terms of, you know, just primarily talking about the blockchain, you know, the blockchain technology, you know, you know, artificial intelligence, that's gonna say, organizations a lot of money, but how much is is a blockchain, you know, solution gonna save an organization? You know, I think that some people see it as a detriment, because now I have to show everything. Right. But, you know, we talk a lot about we talk a lot about, you know, the zero knowledge proof. We talked about that at the at the at the event that that, you know, we did at Georgetown, where, you know, we can we can confirm that you're saying that you're saying what you're saying is indeed true, without showing everything, you know, and I think that if Supply Chain Leaders are educated on that, first, I think that we'll have I think we'll have more more acceptance, I won't say embrace. That's the little that's a little that's a little quick. I think that you know, they'll they'll have more acceptance to actually listen to it more. But, you know, I know that I know that we talked about about blockchain and its sustainability class, you know, in terms of I think we have a case study in terms of V chain, this study is actually for V chain. But the you do you have other classes where you talk about, you know, artificial light technologies, such as artificial intelligence and blockchain within a program.

14:40
Oh, absolutely. Sourcing class, right. Strategic Sourcing and contracting. That's been a big topic, both on you know, how will it I think, from a student perspective, it's how will these technologies change my job? How will they change what I need to know? So actually, the last Last time we had, we're talking about both of the technologies, actually. So, you know, and I think you make a good point. And with AI, it's relatively cheap, in many ways, right? Although, we're still. So I think companies are gonna see some savings, anything from reducing the workload on code to, you know, being able to replicate things, we're, we're just at the forefront of what will happen with AI, and they're ready using it for scouting as suppliers, you know, lots of different ways that you can use that to very easily bring back a large amount of information, sort through it. But it's still at this point requires, you know, intervention by humans at some point. When you look at the blockchain, I think that contracts of sizeable amount are important. But I think what you were talking about, you kind of hit the nail on the head with the zero knowledge proof, right? The issue is supply chain, and we talked about this. Everyone wants to know, the tier two, tier three, but your your manufacturers don't necessarily want you to know that or if you're a distributor, let me use it that way. Because maybe you can go around supply chains weren't necessarily built to be fully transparent. Go from the risk of costs getting out there to what are the actual ingredients I'm using, something's proprietary I, you know, I've developed a formula, I don't want anyone to know that formula. And I don't want them to know my suppliers. So we have both, when you're looking at corporate social responsibility, whether it's carbon, whether it's making sure there's not forced labor, no matter what it is, the difficulty lies in the fact that supply chains don't necessarily want you to know all their suppliers. So if you can do something where some pieces hidden, meaning the name of the supplier amounts, maybe not as much price, certainly, right. But if you can hide those things, but have the other pieces verified, without it being Oh, well, I can still figure it out without the name, right. I mean, there's there needs to be a way. And so I think that that can be done. And that would help sort of grease the wheels, if, you know, if it didn't have full transparency. And it may be you know, using permission blockchains at some point to where you get permission to see certain things, right. So it's that that combo, that might happen, I see that in the medical area as being something you know, there's lots of different use cases, we're talking supply chain and carbon right now. But there's obviously lots of different use cases. And even for the, for the carbon and tracking it, maybe it is permissioned, maybe it's not just open and maybe you only get to see it for you know, certain products, you know, same thing, you have to de risk it for the people who are putting the information out there. And to help de risk it, it may mean that some things have to be anonymous. So I know that goes against the transparency piece, but really you're being transparent about a lot part that matters more than the part that doesn't although people who want to use it to see that the tier two or tier three suppliers are financially sound, they do want to know the names, but maybe for carbon, it doesn't matter. All right, so that's where you might have given different pieces of information that can be attributed to the same company

19:04
Yeah, I think he brought he brought up about four good points there. So yeah, cuz like whenever you saw m&s, and that's the whole thing about about you know, different blockchain protocols and that they're going to have their own their benefits you know, their benefits and things like that. So you know, what with V chain you know, V chain was focused on the supply chain industry, right? And you know, and they're doing a lot within the within the carbon tracking space. Now, you do mention you did mention the whole the whole permission blockchain, you know, permission blockchain thing, which is going to be a topic of discussion once we actually get leaders in this space. But then there's another there's another protocol that that has a number of use cases called Casper, so the CASPER protocol. So they're actually you know, they're saying that you know, one of the main industries they're going they're trying to address is a supply chain industry, but they they're called they're, they're referred to as a hybrid blockchain, where you can pick in choose what information you want to be, you know, transparent, and then what information you don't want. But like I said, you know, zero knowledge Proofs will actually give you that, you know, based on certain use cases, but natively Casper is saying that, you know, we're a hybrid blockchain. So, you know, as people as, as organizations, you know, come on to these protocols, then we'll actually kind of hash out these these particular these particular things. So, you know, again, that's going to be on down the line. So, alright, last question. Probably won't be, but I'll say last question. What, what challenges what challenges do you foresee us having in, you know, tracking, tracking, you know, carbon carbon emissions, carbon credits, carbon offsets on, you know, on the blockchain, in your opinion?

20:52
As I've mentioned, just first, the measurability right, and and methodologies. That's the biggest challenge in my mind. And then it's probably secondly is getting who's going to audit? And how are you validating the auditors, so they may need their own credentials that hat lie on the blockchain to to be able to say, yes, I've done X, Y, and Z and this methodology have this level of training away again, that someone can't rubber stamp, so there's going to be some, you know, it's gonna be a cottage industry in a way of just measurement. But then you have to know how how do you validate the people who are measuring this, that they're using the same methodology that they're trained? So I think that could be one of the uses for the blockchain on sustainability as well? And is that a challenge? More that you'll start like anything else with too many, and something has to shake it out? So there needs to be some kind of I don't want to say governing body but at least a group that is agreeing upon the standards, right? The standards that would be implemented for the measurement of the carbon, and who can you know, who's trained in it, who's certified in it? And then the challenge, I think, with it actually going on the blockchain is probably a little bit less other than as we talked about, you know, being able to possibly make some of it anonymous. I mean, I don't see the actual technology piece, once you have the measurement as being that much of a roadblock. I think it's just getting people on the same page for the measurement. And then getting that group, even if you have that, who can now do the certifications. They would maybe be the issuers or utilize the blockchain, you know, to issue that have the ability to do that. And basically say, yes, I've put this on the blockchain because they've LEED certified and this product has this much carbon.

23:08
Excellent. Thank you for that. So yeah, that's all that's all the questions. That's all the questions that I have. So Linda, thanks. Thanks once again. Where can people find you? Where can people learn more about more about your program?

23:23
Thanks, Justin. Yeah, well, I'm on LinkedIn. So feel free to reach out connect with me on LinkedIn. And then the program they can go to Georgetown's website, Georgetown School of Continuing Studies, and there's a little you know, you just click on there and you'll see all about us there and the program and curriculum and faculty. So hope people are you know, it's a great field. The technology that's coming and impacting this field is just amazing to

23:56
yeah, great field,

23:58
great program and you know, you know, you'll

24:01
have a lot of institutions that are you know, very based you know, research based but you know, Georgia Georgetown program is is practice base, you know, they have have a lot of lot of esteemed faculty, they have a strong have strong people on the advisory board, you know, one of my close peers, Sherry Hines is on the advisory board along with with other other, you know, people with, you know, amazing backgrounds, you know, in the public and private sector. So, check it out. So, once again, thank you and everyone else until next time,

VeChain Foundation Climate Research with Dr. Justin Goldston and Tayler McCracken of The Coin Bureau
Video Link - https://youtu.be/AO-PiQSm_NQ

Yeah, thanks again for inviting me back on further chats. So as Justin just said, I work for the coin bureau. I'm one of the researchers and an analyst there. I've been there for a couple years. Prior to the coin Bureau, I've worked in blockchain investigation, I was a quality control analyst for a couple different crypto companies as well. And I'm currently the editor of the Coimbra website. So but I understand the topic that we're going to talk about today is about climate change. Sorry, if I just kind of jumped in for any there and introduce the topic for you got to go into it. But you say the one thing I'm absolutely not, though, is a expert in climate change. So you know, I'm happy to kind of share my opinions and my views of it. But I'll be the first to admit that I am not the most educated on the subject. I do spend a lot of time listening to people who are far more intelligent than me discuss this topic, and form some ideas and opinions outweigh so I do have some thoughts and questions to share. But you know, by no means do I consider myself an expert on this. And by no means do I even have necessarily an opinion one way or another. So I know this is quite a controversial topic. But yeah, so I so I'm just saying, you know, what I hear and what I feel, but I'm always happy to be proven wrong. And have my mind changed. So?

01:35
Yeah. All right. So let's, let's, let's get into it. So I know one of the first things that we want to, that we want to delve into one of the things that we're researching is, is the whole idea of, of organizations tracking carbon emissions on the on the blockchain, I know that we briefly spoke about, we briefly spoke about, you know, Deborah dulls interview right, there was an eye opening to me, you know, and you know, I talk a lot so actually, I was little exposed to some some of the things that she talked about. So So what are your thoughts on on organizations tracking carbon emissions, they didn't happen. They're there things be or their information being transparent on a blockchain?

02:18
So I think it's, it's a good idea to be aware of our impact on the environment, obviously, without a doubt. But one of the things that Deborah brought up, and I think she really nailed it is, it's, it's incredibly difficult to do. And it's something that I think we're going to waste more resources trying to do it and we'll actually be able to, to successfully complete it. So one of the issues right off the bat is there's no globally agreed standard on, you know, these carbon credit like, like they're, how they're, how they're issued and how we're even tracking carbon. So I'm going to kind of steal a bit from what Deborah was saying here. But she brought up a really good point when she was saying, you know, if we want to track the carbon emissions from a supply chain, from point A to point B, there are a lot of things happening between point A to point B, right? So say, say we're hauling livestock, and it's, we have to know what fertilizer we use for that cow to eat? How far do we have to walk that cow from point A to point B to get it on the truck? How many man hours were involved? What about the factory that raises the cattle? Do they leave their lights on overnight? What kind of an energy grid are they using? And then when we get the actual animal on the truck? What kind of truck is it? You know, what's its engine? Is it is it something that is fuel efficient? So there are so many little checkpoints along the way. And then a truck gets to the destination and say it goes into a slaughterhouse, the slaughterhouse again, like what kind of light bulbs are they using? You know, are they just installed these other kinds of these data points to use it and then we have to get that cow then to the grocery store, then to the, you know, humans plates. And so if you kind of think about all those little checkpoints along the way, if we're actually going to go and measure the carbon footprint for every stop along that journey. I'm like, that is an awful lot of resources and manpower. And I think we're going to end up using a lot. We're going to be using more resources and pro and possibly even contributing to a worse carbon footprint, just trying to track the journey from field to plates. So I do think that's quite an issue. Yes, sir. Was that your question?

04:32
Yeah, yeah, that was that was the question and that you have a good point in terms of the tracking and tracing how they're tracking and tracing may be, may be an issue. So So that's just the effort and tracking and tracing it. How are we going to get on the blockchain? How are we gonna get every single one of those business partners to publish our write that information to you know, the blockchain? And yes, we did. Yes. We talked about how you know, the IoT IoT He devices may be able to track that. But that's just one piece of it. You know, that's just the essence logistical portion of it. Now, we're not talking about the, you know, the information, it needs to be tracked by the farmers, you know, what about the what about the methane, the cows, the cows released into the atmosphere and things like,

05:17
exactly do need to start like measuring cows farts and you know, putting in a scoring credit system as well. So it's also and I do think that blockchain has a really powerful potential for supply chain tracking, like we were talking about how they use it during the rollover the vaccines to check, you know, so I think blockchain can be really useful for, you know, tracking the journey from point A to point B, as far as you know, it can relay data such as temperature and location and how long it was stored at the certain checkpoints. And I think things like that, it's quite useful to put those on an on a digital ledger and use blockchain. But as far as actually tracking the emissions that are that's going on in the process. I'm just not sure if we're quite there yet.

06:04
All right. Got it. I appreciate that. So that's the that's, that's,

06:08
that's step one. Right? Yeah, exactly. That's step one.

06:12
So So, in another in another step, you know, what's your thoughts of what's your thoughts of tracking, you know, carbon credits, carbon credits from the blockchain?

06:23
So I carbon credits is another hot topic to write. And so I'm gonna pull from some notes here. But I think the carbon credit idea for anybody who doesn't know it has been shown to be well just quite cropped its own nature. So it was, the idea for them was first kind of rolled out during the Tokyo accord in 1995. And the UN did a study. Got it, like, just read my own notes here. Yeah, the UN ended up doing a study that just basically showed over 75% of the carbon credits issued, there was no, basically they were issued, and nobody knows what even happened with them, like, you know, they just kind of went into the ether, and they just disappear. It's over 75% actually had no impact whatsoever. And then what's even worse than that is they know that Russia and Ukraine were basically using carbon credits for washe trading. And they were actually like, gamifying the system. So one of the things that Russia was caught doing was doing anything, again, with my notes, right, like a doctor. Yeah, so basically, what Russia was doing is they were changing the the basically the, the requirements. So again, this goes back to the fact that there's no agreed issuance of doing this, there's no like globally agreed way of doing it. So basically, what Russia decided to do is they were taking out the CFC and the HF C S, which are greenhouse gases, they were taking the these checks out in 2011. And then basically, they were releasing carbon credits, buying them back. And then they're saying that they were taking the CFCs and HCFCs is out of the environment. And basically, what this was allowing to do was it was allowing companies to increase their carbon outputs. And because they weren't tracking the harmful portions of it, right. So I probably I'm not really smart enough to understand what all that means. But yeah, so basically, they were just gamifying the system, they were making millions. And I want to give credit to a there's a really brilliant YouTube video from Belinda Carr. And she basically pulls up 10 Key instances that it's, you know, it's been verified how the carbon credits system has been quite corrupt. And I think I'm not going to go through a whole video, but I think one of my favorite things that she really kind of puts it into the ground is she brings up a use case of an oil tanker. It's a French company. And basically what they're doing is they're pulling natural gas in the ground in Australia, hauling it over to China. And you know, that's using a hell of a lot of carbon. And then what they did is they turned around, and they invested in a 10 year old wind farm in China. And then also they were claiming that they were net, like net carbon zero. And she's like, I'm sorry, she's like, having, like wind power does not directly translate to offsetting carbon, she's like, those are two very different things, like you released a lot of like carbon into the air. And just by investing into a wind farm, that that's not negating the damage that was done. So one of one of my biggest personal issues with these carbon credits is we're basically allowing companies to pollute more if they're willing to buy these credits. And we already know that these credits are going towards tree farms where the trees aren't even being planted. In some cases, there's been a you know, a couple of companies get in trouble for that. They're claiming they're planting trees that they're not. And legally these trees can be cut down after 10 years. So say you're dumping loads of carbon into the atmosphere with and you're buying these carbon credits or going to planting trees. Also, they can just cut these tree down these trees down after 10 years. So I kind of think this is similar to, you know, if you've got a bucket full of water and you're punching a bunch of holes in the bucket and you're patching the holes, and it's like, well, when it a bit just been better if you didn't punch the holes in the bucket in the first place. You know, if you truly cared about the environment, you shouldn't just be basically, it's almost like a form of bribery. It's a way of paying these companies extra money to just let you pollute as much as you want. So I think the carbon credits are a bit of a, it is a bit of a scam. Something else actually Deborah has, she makes a really good point in her note, as well as, again, the lack of global standards. So Delta airline pays $2.30 per ton for their carbon emissions, Microsoft pays $20 per ton. And Bill, you're sorry, 2 million and Bill Gates pays 600 million. So it's like so why is Bill Gates having to pay far more than, say, delta? So like, if we're all polluting the same way, then why isn't there more of a standard across the board? So there's just a lot of yeah, there's just too many inconsistencies for my liking. And the fact that people are speculating on these as well, that really kind of bothers me, it's, um, if our goal is to do what's better for the planet, then why are we using carbon credits to speculative asset as well, we're using them to buy trade sell profit from like, ultimately, the these bloody things are being used to, yeah, invest in buy sell homes on life. So you're not really caring about the problem, you're caring about using these carbon credits as another speculative assets. And furthermore, is this kind of ties into this ESG narrative as well. And it's, it's politics and corporations that are trying to dictate the way that we're supposed to be healing the planet, right. And I'm like, and the majority of us are for profit companies and enterprises that are trying to play by this set of rules. And for me, personally, I'm like, if I sit down in a room with 50, scientists who understands the way the planet works, and you know, they've studied the environment things, and if they tell me, they're like, you know, this is what's best for the environment, I'm going to be inclined to believe them. But a bunch of, you know, been in business suits from companies and for profit corporations trying to tell me, Hey, we can fix the planet, while simultaneously patting their bank account, that raises some red flags for me, because they're not doing things if it's not in their best interest, right. And that's the money's always the bottom line. So I'm skeptical of the entities that are behind these narratives as well. And it's not just me sounding like crazy person here. I mean, there's been a few states in the US who have openly rallied against this, you know, ESG investment movement as well. And the governor of Florida is, you know, he's actually proposing like, anti ESG bills and things like that. Because, yeah, it's just been shown to be a flight model. So I'm not saying that nothing needs to be done about it. But I don't think carbon credits are the way to go. Maybe carbon offsets could be could be an idea. But again, these are questions for people way smarter than me to kind of figure out

13:11
okay, how do they how do they say it? How they say it shots fired?

13:18
I just want to humble man's opinion, and crazy rants on the internet.

13:23
But so I actually saw why you were Yeah, so I actually got I think I got that so exposing the carbon credit and offset scam and the one from Belinda car because there's two Yes. So

13:31
So um, yeah, but Belinda car, she she puts it far more eloquently than I do. But yeah, she just basically has one called Carbon Credit scam. And even if you just Google carbon credit scam, there's a lot of really good advice. And it's not even just theories, it's, you know, like the UN has found this through their investigations and things like that, that. Yeah, the vast majority of these things aren't doing what they claim to do. Got it is it's a bit of a shame. And and I don't know if it was set up. I mean, I would imagine it was set up with good intentions, but it's just like anything, it's been gamified. I mean, it's and people will do with everything, right? Like I use, I'm a big fan of this one crypto app where you basically get crypto for walking, and people hook it up to a drill and just spin a drill and they just get free and you know, so it's like this app came out with good intentions, like, let's get people fit, let's get people moving. And this guy was like, Nah, was Sweatcoin. And this guy's like, I'm just gonna hook it up to a drill. And it's like, so people are always gonna find ways to mess with the system, right?

14:32
Yeah, I still I still get notifications from Sweatcoin like three times a day about things, you know. So, but you mentioned that So you mentioned that, that there could be a potential solution for carbon offsets. Can you expand expand on that a little bit?

14:47
Yeah, I think so. So again, I'm far from an expert in the space but basically, there is a difference between carbon credits and carbon offsets and carbon credits is basically paying more so you can pollute more in a sense and you can Basically trade these things. So if you have extra carbon credits leftover, sell them whatever. But what carbon offsets are, is actually trying to have more of like a direct impact. So you can capture methane and you can use it for fuel. And just do things like lower energy usage and invest in renewable energy and things like that. So it's things that more have like a direct impact. So companies can actually say, you know, instead of using electricity, we're now going to move to a solar panel. And there are there are benefits and incentives in place to do things like that. But I think some of the most impactful ones, again, we've seen with Bitcoin miners, so you know, they're taking flared gas that would otherwise be wasted, it's in the atmosphere polluting as well. And so instead of that, just going in the atmosphere, Bitcoin miners are now actually able to grab that. And that would be a form of carbon offsetting, because they're offsetting what would be polluting, and they're putting it to use to create Bitcoin. A lot of people do with things like methane is a big one for various different uses. So I think, I think what's might happen with carbon that that I would quite like to see is maybe not even trying to reduce it, maybe just find an alternate use for it, you know, like, so instead of just letting it go in the complaint, let's, let's caption let's do something with it. Because I mean, you know, you and I are carbon plastic is carbon. So, you know, instead of just wasting it, let's, let's maybe find a use for it. I mean, again, these these are questions and things for other people to kind of figure out but yeah, so that kind of my two cents is, let's resolve the problem, not just just throw money at it right. And just go on another little bit of a tangent here is I do think by us trying to use blockchain technology, you're getting too much enjoyment out of this. So I, there's a an old cliche talks about bring the cars the the horse before the buggy, right? And I think blockchain has a tendency to that as well. So I'm obviously I'm a huge fan of blockchain technology, I think it can do some incredible things. But I think one of the things that V chain is trying to do is solve a problem that we don't even understand yet. There's no scientific consensus on what the problem actually is. And you know, when we think about climate change, so many people that just default to Yeah, the Earth is getting hotter. But it's actually a very complex, multifaceted problem. It's. So you know, they stopped calling it global warming. Now, it's climate change. And it's like, are we looking at this from a precipitation perspective? Are we talking about this from a temperature perspective, because in different parts of the world, there's all sorts of different things going on, you know, there's flooding in one area and droughts and elsewhere, like we've never seen before. You know, we're breaking high temperatures, low temperatures, and there's a lot more going on than just just heating. And, and one thing that worries me about this is when the scientific community can't come up to a with, with a consensus on like, how can we understand what's going on or, or try and solve it when we don't even we can't even agree on what the problem is. So I met to grab the name of an interesting TED Talk. But basically, there was a guy that was studying our impact on the environment. I'll get the name too after this. And basically, he made a very revolutionary discovery. And he actually found that one of the problems is just the fact that we are corralling livestock and keeping them in one area. So he did an experiment in Africa where he was actually like, let's just let livestock just roam roam freely. And that was his solution. And and the effects were quite incredible, really. So basically, because the animals were walking, and they were, you know, their feces and urine were spreading all over it completely regenerated areas of the desert where they thought it's too arid, nothing can grow as soon and so it's, you know, a lot of scientists are like, we need less cows, less cattle, less methane. And this guy's will like, Well, wait a minute, he's like, I just put this real profit or in real practice. He's like, I just put more cows more methane, more livestock in the fields. And it's actually regenerating the planet, and regenerating greenery and stuff. So I think the thing with with climate change is it's like we need a consensus. We need to understand a problem before we can tackle it. So whether or not crypto or blockchain is the solution, I don't know. But I heard something that I quite liked the other day and I kind of related to this issue here is they're talking about blockchain gaming, and they're saying that one of the problems with crypto is on blockchain in general is we do have the potential to solve so many problems. But maybe we're not the right people to be doing it. So you saw me like crypto gaming, and the reason why crypto gaming is so cool crap, is because it's people in crypto trying to create video games. It's the wrong way around. He's like the video game community doesn't need crypto. Crypto needs the video game community to adopt it. And I kind of think about that with what the chicken is trying to do as well. It's first and foremost are a technology company. What do they know about climate change? I mean, maybe they know a lot and I know that they do some work. With the UN, and I'm sure they've got some brilliant advisors on board. But I think Kryptos focus should be on all blockchain sorry, is they should just be building the tools. And you know the potential and then basically its existing industry should be integrating blockchain into what they do. So ideally, what I would like to see is, again, I want to see this lead this initiative to say the world should be led from an academic and a scientific perspective. It shouldn't be being ran from UN, from politicians from businesses, corporations, it shouldn't be a blockchain company. So you know, I'd like to see if, if the scientific community realizes you're like, hey, we can use blockchain technology to help with our golden grades. But I do find it a bit weird that it's V chain being like, hey, let's save the planet. And it's like, Well, wait, you guys were a crypto company? Like, let's Yeah, so I think it might be a bit skewed. So yeah, just need to understand the problem. I think first and foremost,

21:00
interesting. Interesting. So So you met you met you brought up? You brought up a you brought up a good, good point. And it made me think of another thing and in terms of so you said that the cow, the cow TED talk, and I want I want to get that one, by the way. Yeah, I'll send it to you. That one sounds great. But so you said it was regenerating, regenerating, you know, the areas, you know, the arid areas. So what's your thoughts on? What's your thoughts on on this whole refile movement? We're starting to hear we're starting to hear about within the web three space. And my second question, my follow up question is going to be based on your response.

21:39
Okay, no, I mean, I think that, again, it's the intentions I guess, and I now I'm just going to completely contradict myself. Because I like to see it. I do. Um, I kind of give a pretty corny answer. But when people ask me what my favorite blockchain project is, I often say whatever, whatever ones trying to have the best impact on the planet. So So I mean, I'll get behind any blockchain project that seems like they can make life better they can make, you know the world better, which I, you know, I realized that that's kind of contradicting what I've just previously said about why are crypto companies trying to do everything? But I mean, I think it's a good first step. And so yeah, if a crypto company thinks maybe they can take a crack at something, and they can make the world a better place, then I mean, go for it. I mean, you've got, you know, I'll stand by on the sidelines, and I'll cheer you on with the flag. And, you know, I hope they come with something groundbreaking, something revolutionary, but I don't see it coming from the crypto community, I think, I think it's got to come from the traditional and I think it has to be traditional industry who are experts in that industry in that niche, and they're gonna have to adopt crypto into their world, I don't see how it could be the other way around. So you know, the saving the planet thing? I mean, are you a blockchain developer? Or are you an ecologist? I mean, if you're both awesome, brilliant. And if you can work together, then yeah, great, but it's not some crypto bros can't save the world. You know, it's, we need some some traditional experts in these fields. For sure.

23:14
Yeah. I love it. I love it, as you can tell, but alright, so basically, based on that answer, what do you think the implementation strategy would be? In order to successfully implement a solution that would save the planet? With these protocols? I know you I know, you'd briefly touched on it. But you know, what? Thoughts?

23:44
Yeah, so I think that's a tricky one. So I think, um, the traditional pillars are already in place, there's already people working on on these, you know, solutions and trying to, you know, to Greenify the planet and make it a better place. So, I guess I kind of see it, if I have to kind of picture in my mind. It's, it's basically it's like, the tech is running along this real way. And then, you know, if we're talking about, you know, to make things simple, it's like, well, bringing down global temperatures. So there are people working on that along this, this, you know, linear path, and then there are people working on the tech on on this side of the path, and at some point, they're going to have to merge. But I think, yeah, I mean, how they're going to integrate. I mean, like, I guess they're gonna have to build the tools, the tech guys, you're gonna have to build tools, and then the people in the real world industries are gonna have to see if they can adopt these tools to help with their mission. I guess what it's gonna come down to.

24:41
Yeah, yeah. And but, like I said, like you said, it's already there. But I think the I think the bottleneck is the education piece. Yes, I might be biased, but I think it's the education piece where, you know, the scientists and the real people that understand the problems they don't understand and You know, Blockchain, you know. So I think that and I don't really think about I didn't really realize this until you actually explained it. So I think that I mean, we always talk about, we always talk about, oh, we need to educate the onboarding, to educate to, to get the wide adoption. But whenever we say educate, we're talking about educating people and setting up wallets and things like that, you know, you make an excellent point in that we need to educate the scientists, we need to educate the academics, on what the on what the potential is for the certain blockchain because like you said, they see blockchain is creating basically blockchain is Aetherium. And Bitcoin, you know, there's hundreds of there's hundreds of other blockchain blevet layer one, layer two is to, you know, block chains out there that are there for certain use cases. You know, you know, you got, you got the beat chains, you got the cellos, you got the, you know, you got the algorithm, that's, that's looking to make a positive impact on the planet, you know, Hadera hash graph, who are who are looking to we're focused on on this sustainability aspect, you know, but even us within the web three space, we can't keep up with them all, you know, so, so So, I mean, I think that, you know, the education from the technology is going to be is going to be a step that I don't think that many people were actually looking at. I mean, there's too much going yes, there's a lot going on, not too much. There's a lot going on in this space. But you know, I think that you know, education needs to be it needs needs to be closer look needs to be taken into it that if we're going to achieve what we're trying to achieve in a study like this, or in the study, like the other interview you did with financial literacy.

26:38
No, absolutely. And again, I think we're the topic with the environment is I think, again, there has to be consensus among, you know, the scientific community, we have to understand you can't solve the problem if you don't know what the problem is. So it's, you know, first thing I do think we have to understand what the problem is and then the best way to go forward with fixing it. But you know, you might find this a bit interesting this is something I really kind of blew me away with how education and academia is kind of intertwining with Blockchain is I got to attend this absolutely brilliant conference. It was held in Germany I was I dialed in remotely and you know, if I think like environmental stuff is over my head, this was from the medical community so it was professors from different German universities. Watch, sir was universities all over the world, but they were actually using and, and stuff like this will amaze me because I cover a lot of like, video game crypto projects, and like things that are fairly like low, I mean, highly entertaining level, but fairly low impact. And what this conference was all about is how geneticists are using the Ethereum blockchain. And I'm probably going to completely butcher this because this was all pretty high level stuff, and I'm sitting or trying to take notes. You know, like a kindergartener scribbling with a crayon. But basically, they were using Blockchain technology in a way to glow to globally collaborate on the study of genetic deformities and people. And the reason why, and you know, one of the things is people are always the ones who have to be on the blockchain, just use a database. But they were using like Zika roll ups and things in a way. That's basically what this allowed to do, because there's always Doctor client confidentiality. So you can't just share things globally. So basically, they were studying genetic deformities, and collaborating on it globally. And, and because they were using a theory and blockchain technology they were or something. But basically, it allowed all these different members of the scientific community to look at the same case study without exposing confidential information about the patients. And you know, look at the history, and there are actually quite a few different use cases. And that was the first the first real eye opener for me and I was about a year ago. And that was the first real eye opener for me, I was like, man, it's crypto is about more than just finance. I mean, Blockchain is about a lot more than just finance and, you know, monkey pictures. It's, it's making a fundamental impact on you know, the medical community. And hopefully, we'll see the, the the greenhouse gas issue. Hopefully, it'll solve all sorts of problems.

29:04
Yeah, that's one thing. That's one thing I keep talking about from a supply chain perspective, where organizations don't want to show everything you know, across their supply chain networks, you know, and I think that zero knowledge proofs are going to have a massive impact once organizations began to adopt to adopt a solution. So So that's, that's all I saw what questions that I had. I know we went this one went a little long, and I love it. So Tyler, do you have any you have anything else you want to share?

29:35
No, I mean, I'll get that info over to you. And yeah, we'll keep in touch. I'm really interested, the work you're doing and stuff. So I'm definitely gonna, you know, give you a follow and buggy every couple of weeks you're up to? Absolutely. So

29:47
where can everyone find you?

29:49
Yeah, so obviously at the coin Bureau, you can find me there. I'm not very active on LinkedIn. I am on there, but I'm pretty active on Twitter, just at Taylor TBM. And that's Taylor with an E So if you want to I drop some ridiculous memes and hopefully some interesting crypto tidbits of information

30:07
all right thank you thanks again for coming on and everyone else until next time

VeChain Foundation Climate Research - Justin Goldston w_ Mohamed Mnif Co-Founder of HERO
Video Link - https://youtu.be/RPfYusUYDMw

Hi everyone, we're back with a with a V chain, the V chain research. Today we have Muhammad Muhammad, can you introduce yourself to let everyone know what you do with an Essbase?

00:12
Yeah, actually, thank you for having me in school my name is Mohan Jimmy and I am an intrapreneur in the climate space, having a financial and economic background, with the with an experience in the blockchain industry intrapreneurship. For the last six years, I started my career as a chartered accountant in the financial industry. And back in 2016, when I understood that more radical adjustment needs to be done to vote to the financial industry and I was having certain ideas around circular economy and like different new paradigms that were introduced. With a for the Industrial Revolution, I would say. And by that time, I had the chance to find my first white paper, and to take part of the the 3d conference in Paris. And I fell in love with decentralized technologies and in general, quit my job and went for an entrepreneurship journey around web three, built the first startup in Paris Allawi peer to peer energy trading, and tokenizing carbon credits. At that time, it's called latency. And we created the currency backed by renewable energy. Back in 2020, I co founded a company in Tunisia called Data blockchain house of blockchain, which would, she's positioned as the blockchain hub in North Africa. And since last year, I went with my two co founders, and with you on a very exciting new journey around the project called Hero. And it's a platform to connect citizen around the world to climate mobilizers working on policy change, to provide climate mobilizers a basic income, so they can go full time on what we consider being the most important job of our time. The hero platform is built on web two today, using still using the blockchain technology for for many addressability, and for voting on the platform. But we are still going on web two model currently. Excellent, thanks

03:21
for that. So So given that you have given that you have experienced in working with individuals in Paris and North Africa, you know, I'm still I'm in the US. You know, I know that there are some people in the US that that are a little bit hesitant in adopting, you know, these technologies, because I feel that, you know, Blockchain is linked to crypto and things like that. Right. So So I guess my first question is going to be what has been the response from people within the Paris region and North Africa region? Yeah,

03:53
actually, this is something that I came up to, as well, after a few years of the upgrade experience in the web industry. And as much as they believe it's decentralization is the future and I would say it's already running today. It's already happening. It's not even an illusion. And it's a deep belief that the swing for web three is already on the way. I still see some resistance in adoption. From the mainstream, unfortunately, due to lack of information due to scepticism and risk adversity, and this is one of the reasons we decided to build here on the web to model today. Validate to validate the value proposition strengthen the community around The real value prop and and then adapt the model with the market trend toward the distant towards full decentralization and use in the web re architecture.

05:22
Okay, sounds good. Sounds good. So based on based on the work that you're doing based on the work that you're doing, Ken, what are some of the words some of the things that people can do to successfully implement sustainability efforts on the blockchain?

05:47
I think the incentives is to validate the solution and intrapreneur is bringing to a very specific pain wherever it's been built on a blockchain or not. The blockchain is a technology is a technology layer that can be used for to secure the network to ensure the traceability and transparency of the system. But it shouldn't be on the front of what is being met.

06:30
Interesting, interesting. So So Can you can you kind of expand on what what you've seen others have been building have been building in web three and in blockchain and collaborations. I know that you're that you work a little bit with a Zillow, Zillow, Blockchain, a

06:48
lot of projects are being built on on the cellular network, and other networks as well, from mauler to source to stack the cielo to can. And it's between defy Rifai. Mainly, this is the main guideline that the cielo blockchain decided to position itself in the blockchain industry. And as much as a lot of these solutions are today, like functional and you can already use them on if you have valora. App, as much as I believe it's just to scope it in a small niche that can be enhanced and enlarged with massive adoption. So developers can add the new layers of features that can benefit the user.

08:00
Excellent. So So yeah, thank you. I also want to know one more question. So you mentioned you mentioned that you'd been you've been dealing with with policy change, and some in some areas, so what what have what has been the response with the with the policymakers and the regulators? And also, what's been the, what's been the process of educating them, you know, within within this within this process, and these tools and these technologies.

08:34
Personally, what we are building with Hiro around policy change is policy change for the climate space, not for the blockchain or crypto regulation. And for both cases are facing an inclusive approach to citizen in order to it starts I would say, with a decentralized communication, decentralized glue, and then comes decentralized finance. But the basic layer should be a decentralized conversation that needs to happen between the different stakeholders between citizen policymakers and organizations and different types of organizations before cannon up to a decentralized low that doesn't go top down, but will work more horizontal way and engage both or multiple stakeholders and the reduction of this decentralized low end being implemented either in smart contracts or a different calendar of agreement that can produce the the agreement, I think, the next one secured decentral Well as the agreement, we can go then to a decentralized finance component and, and creating value out of this agreement.

10:12
Excellent. I appreciate that. So thank you for your time today. My hard work and where can people find you?

10:19
Actually, you can find me on LinkedIn. It's my Twitter, both of them on LinkedIn, I think is my most used social network.

10:32
All right. So once again, thank you for your time and everyone else. Until next time, thanks.

VeChain Foundation Climate Research - Justin Goldston Interviews Drew Bonneau of KlimaDAO
Video Link - https://youtu.be/9fXhRMkdPlc

Hi everyone, in this discussion we're going to be talking with Drew from Clement from clay McDowell. And we're going to see how we can how we can bring in clay McDowell from to kind of provide cross chain solutions. So Drew, you want to introduce yourself?

00:22
Sure, thanks. Thanks, Justin. So I'm Drew, leading partnerships at thema Tao have about eight years of experience in the climate finance space. I've worked with carbon project development financing. I've also worked with some tech companies doing different innovative things with monitoring, reporting and verification, using different remote sensing technologies. And I've also just been a carbon trader in the market on renewable energy certificates and things of that nature. So yeah, excited to speak our climate I was doing, we've been in the market for about a year and a half. Now, I suppose. One of the largest holders of carbon liquidity in the blockchain space is about 25 million tons of tokenized, or digitized carbon offsets that have made their way to the polygon blockchain. And Lehman is building a variety of different tooling and typically building at the infrastructure layer for different applications to tap into that carbon liquidity and build unique applications with digital hub. That's me.

01:23
Excellent. I appreciate that. So can you can you kind of expand on why you all chose polygon?

01:31
Certainly. So one of the key benefits, I think, of blockchain technology in the kind of partner spaces is in particular with public blockchains. Right. So of course, there's a variety of different public blockchains. But we chose polygon because there is a very, let's say, active developer community. It's an EVM compatible chain, which is a lost, there's a lot of EVM developers already. And it's really important to have, let's say, a very vibrant defined community, or decentralized finance, that can build different types of interoperable applications together, because I think that's how we really spur on innovation in this industry is when people can build together like that. So you want a chain where there's a lot going on there. The other piece is that polygon, in comparison to other l twos of polygon, proof of stake is technically like a side chain. They do have some true LT solutions in the pipeline. But the other condition with them is that they've had tremendous traction when it comes to corporate adoption. Right? A lot of that right now is just marketing efforts and doing some interesting things with NFE projects and such. But then it's not so much of a leap for these corporates to say, Okay, we're already using polygon for projects, XYZ. Let's also start to use them for some of our ESG initiatives, and tap into that chain and the infrastructure there for sourcing different types of environmental assets.

02:59
Excellent, excellent. So So given that we're trying to bring in bring in the masses, good, we're trying to bring in enterprises, right, what current work current challenges do you see within the climate within the climate, finance, space? And adoption?

03:20
Yeah. So this is a really, really important part for what we're trying to do. And that's the interfacing challenge, right? I think decentralized finance generally, really has this challenge with with the interface on we can't expect corporates and really just the majority of users to create let's say, a web three wallet, use meta mask, you know, sign into an application, do everything like that, you'd have to make the experience more, let's say went to like, where they're comfortable logging in with an email, maybe isn't two factor authentication, being able to see the different types of blockchain based assets they have, be able to send transactions easily and unverified manner. That's, that's really crucial. That's some of the one of the points that I was working on with our partners. But you know, I think it's kind of like where the internet was out in mind was before web browsers became more intuitive and everything. I think that in the next year or two people won't even realize it interacting with Watson. Right. It's just all going to be abstracted away. And that's really the direction we need to go to to get mass adoption.

04:25
Okay, okay. So, So, alright, so once we once we get to once we get to adoption, because I think that you've had the discussion of, you know, based on the use case, everything doesn't have to be on the blockchain. Right. But in terms of in terms of, you know, carbon offsets, you know, carbon you know, carbon emissions tracking, what do you think are the benefits of utilizing of utilizing blockchain

05:00
Yeah, so we, I think, like clean Dallas approach to this isn't unique necessarily. institutions like the World Bank have cited the benefit of blockchain. And I've seen it as a, let's say, inappropriate technology to apply to the climate finance space. But why is that? Blockchain really provides unprecedented transparency and traceability of different types of assets. And it can be done in a way where you have essentially a neutral infrastructure that's doing this that a variety of different stakeholders can both monitor but then also interact with. So I think this goes back then to this idea of having a vibrant defy developer community. If you're all building on what's a neutral public infrastructure in a trustless manner, which blockchain provides. People can build different types of applications together, and not have to rely on some centralized party to ensure that there's, you know, congruence with the data and things of that nature can all just run on the blockchain. So I think that's a really strong suit. The other piece is that right now, the voluntary carbon market is very fragmented, just trading activity that takes place OTC in a very opaque fashion. And when you can start to move that market activity onto a blockchain, there are interesting data insights that I think can be empowering to the market, which simply aren't really possible today. Today, if you're looking at, let's say, market analysis of the long term market, you're relying on retrospective, often survey based studies. So you're going to be looking at data that's Munsell. Right. In contrast, just a very concrete example on this. It's a claim that has the carbon taxi medallion at farmer's market dashboard. And in real time, we can see all the activity taking place from different types of digital earnings sets. So we'll be able to see, you know, what kind of projects are most interesting to corporates, which geographies seem to be having having high interest in the corporate sector looking to offset their carbon and so on, all that data will be available? And I think that's going to be

07:09
excellent. So So yeah, you were talking about you were talking about, you know, bringing bringing devs in to your to your ecosystem to your protocol. So my question to you is, how do you how do you recruit and retain Deb's when there's, frankly, when there's a lot of competition out there across within the web three space? I'm very interested in this one.

07:33
Yeah. Yeah, um, let's see, you know, Klieman is a decentralized autonomous organization or doubt. It's the first Dow that I've been part of, but it's really interesting to see how one with the the transparency of like governance decisions, how that happens. And then also through the token omics, that different contributors, of course, have skin in the game right away, because you have the clean the token, you can then engage in governance, for instance, do you have a voice to make your decisions on how funds are allocated, and the different types of projects that we undertake? That that's all very transparent. There's a clear governance process discussions from the community and then voting to determine that. So it's very meritocratic, I would say as well. And that's an interesting piece, I think is attractive to people. And it's out. The other side is just working in climate finance right now. I think if people are looking for something meaningful, where they can have a real impact on, it's the future of the planet and society in many ways, and then leverage this new novel technology, we're ready to cross or clean it out works with the interface of blockchain finance. So I think that's a that's strong messaging. It's something that resonates with a lot of people. And so we've been fortunate to be able to attract a lot of

08:55
excellent. I like that. So so how long? How long do you think it's going to take for to get this down type governance type structure for web to what we call web two companies, by traditional traditional organizations, you know, how long how long do you think is going to it's going to take to get the adoption of this type of model.

09:22
As you know, I can see him in 912 months, we'll have some more industry players that are a bit more involved, right. We've done a lot of education around what it is that we're actually doing. And this comes back to another point of like, why is the data structure interesting or why is it interesting was interesting, the blockchain. So we're building these different infrastructure pieces to facilitate the market and the way that we're doing there. And by building on blockchain, all these different market participants can have a voice in that but also have, let's say, ownership over that infrastructure. Right. And that's something that doesn't exist in the truth. issue of market today even, right, it's all, you know, siloed, exchanges centrally controlled, fragmented, in a way, kind of harmonizing all that, and then everybody can have a voice. And if you join up, of course, that's, that's the thesis that we're after. Will different actors actually want to do that, because there's a lot of competition in the market, we have to see, but the tools that we're building, we try to be neutral and just build an infrastructure layer that other people can build on top. So we'll have to see how much adoption was there. The other piece is on the regulation side. Mmm, hmm. Wyoming, for example, like does recognize Dows is a legal entity type. There's a few other jurisdictions in the world that are starting to do this, too. I think that's important for legitimacy, and for different players to feel comfortable about it. Okay,

10:51
so you said that you've been you've been educating people, you've been educating people on what you all do right. Now, are you saying that you've been educating traditional companies on what you do?

11:03
Primarily? Yeah, I mean, you know, there's so much stuff happening with the VA, right. And what we're doing, though, has this direct time to go into like the off chain world, or the real world, whatever it may be, you know, we have to onboard these players in the market that have been here for the last 20 years, you know, and to show them how this technology can be used, and how it can be empowering to what they're doing. So that is a pretty core mission is what we do. And that's why, most recently, we've been hosting this webinar series, called on set, we're trying to get a lot of industry players in there, you know, to showcase to them what it is that we're doing. I think the first webinar is titled Introduction to Digital carbon. I think that's a great resource for people in the market to take a look at what we're doing and what blockchain in the name.

11:51
Okay, now, what's been what's been the feedback? What's been the feedback from the from the industry? Like, what have they been saying? Because I'm curious.

12:00
So, I mean, you know, some, some organizations are pretty, let's say, pretty interested. And they see the potential here, they see how it can disintermediate the market to a certain extent, and help deliver more finance to the carbon project developers themselves, and through that local communities that are on the frontlines of climate impact. So that's exciting. I think that, you know, they see it as a direct route, to financing and to the demand side participants in the market. There's others that, I think see what we're doing as well competition for them. Now, I mentioned that the idea of disintermediation, whenever you do that in the market, people are going to push back because there's middlemen that are taking part of the profit, right. So, you know, those types of players are certainly far less receptive to what we're doing. Then you have other there's other groups that they associate anything with Blockchain with, like, you know, scams and hacks. And it's just Wild West, right? Yes. That's something we have to overcome.

13:05
Yeah. Excellent. And I know I know that. So are you do you do anything with the with two can protocols? I know that you were actually you were actually we're, we're working with that? They're kind of totally right, if I'm not mistaken.

13:19
Yeah. So Touken protocol developed like the this first carbon bridge, it's called. So that basically allows you to digitize the offsets that existed in the Para carbon registry. So Vera pause Virginia First, while they developed this framework that they feel comfortable with. But in that time, like all the major carbon registries have started working groups and figuring out how can we do this digitization? We're going to do it ourselves, are we going to use a third party? Those are all things that are getting figured out. And there's other carbon bridges that are emerging into mosser and C three, et cetera? There's a there's a few players. Excellent.

13:55
Excellent. So if so, if an organization is last question, if the organization is looking to enter into this space, you know, what would be the what would be the implementation path? What would be the digital transformation journey you take for a web two company moving into web three?

14:27
Yeah, so I'll answer that through the lens of like a carbon project developer, to provide context. So you know, right now, they may partner with different organizations that are going to buy their credits and then find end buyers to make it forward deals or just swap deals, etc. But what this project developer can do now is that they can directly link into the market and see what their types of credits are trading it, that the pricing is available 24/7 Fully transparently on the blockchain so they can have a choice. So let's do just selling their credits directly in the market and after they bring them on chain, or they could load them into a marketplace. And you know, sell them for fixed pricing the different participants that can integrate them into some of the other web retooling that does like automated offsetting different FinTech solutions and such. The big thing for them, this part of the journey is they need to connect the carbon registry account with the blockchain. And that's getting more streamlined nowadays. Again, a lot of this is going to get abstracted away, you're not going to have to worry about meta masks, you're just going to have one account, you know, with the current Registry, or with another custodian that will manage all that for that. And then it's just going to be like they had any other account online, you're just going to click a few buttons, move some credits around, they're not going to worry about any blockchain stuff at all won't be, you know, in the background. Yeah.

15:55
Yeah, I know. I know. I said that was the last question, but a lot. So. So hopefully, hopefully, this will be the last one. But so what was your thoughts in terms of in terms of interoperability within within Islamic finance space?

16:10
Yeah, so this is, this is an important one, to a gentleman from PSC. So they are grouped under the I was at the Global blockchain Business Business Council gbbc. So they they are looking at what kind of working groups they can have here. And one of them that I'm really pushing for is the development of an open digital carbon data standard. Now, what does that mean? It means that we have the data framework in place for how carbon offsets are stored on a blockchain. It also means that we start to standardize the processes at the smart contract level on, I don't know, if it's more like carbon retirements, that means when you actually claim the environmental benefit, and then that credits taken out of the market, so all these different processes need to be standardized. And this BFC group, their infrastructure, working groups, are looking at this and they're, you know, a neutral body. They're working in funded by multiple layer one block chains. And they're also working with the carbon registries themselves. So this is exciting, because of course, this type of standardization is really important in the market, if we have, you know, all the innovation happening across these different block chains and so on being able to compound let's

17:26
see, all right, and then what's the name of that group again?

17:29
So it's VFC and confined to things like blockchain, climate something and then BX CI is the blockchain on an Infrastructure Working Group. Those organizations are underneath the global blockchain Business Council.

17:46
Okay. Okay. Blockchain Business Council. Okay. Okay, all right. Perfect. Yeah. So So yeah, that's pretty much everything, everything that I had. So do you have kind of any, any any parting words? Where can where can people find you? And you know, what do you what what, what, what final takeaways or call to action? Would you have?

18:17
Sir, yeah. Would you say? Look, this is a really exciting space. I think blockchain technology is starting to mature, the interfaces are getting better. There's just so much innovation happening. And I think climate finance itself is also a growing field. It's tremendously growing good. 30x by 2030, that's carbon offsets in the voluntary carbon market. And so you know, if you are, let's say, a developer, or just someone working on in finance, and you're interested in what's going on here, check out clean it out that finance, we have a great resources section, we've written extensively on all the topics that I've talked about in this discussion. And you can also follow me on Twitter, it's at Drew underscore Lima, I post a lot about the different developments in this space as well as the carbon offsetting market more generally. And yet, be happy to engage in this discussion and also if your company happy to help you source and utilize digital carbon assets in the future.

VeChain Foundation Climate Research - Justin Goldston Interviews Nalin Agarwal of Climate Collective
Video Link - https://youtu.be/9cCBNgfyboI

Sure, thanks. Thanks, man. Thanks for having having me, you will on this on the stock. So I'm a partner, the climate collective in India, where not for profit that runs climate tech accelerator programs, largely in the South Asian region so far. So India, Sri Lanka, Maldives. In the past, as well, in Nepal, we started off actually as solar and wind project developers between 2010 and 2015, that from 2016 onwards, we've grown the climate tech startup ecosystem in South Asia through accelerators, I now oversee a lot of the work we do on the capital side. So we are fundraising platform, just setting up a VC fund. All of that. Yeah. And, and we've supported about 160, climate tech startups, so it has become the largest platform in South Asia. This year, we're gonna expand to Southeast Asia as well. And next year, to Africa, and hereafter to Latin. So we have a global south ambition after having kind of proven the model and supported startups in South Asia over the last seven years.

01:44
Stop. Yeah. Excellent. I appreciate that. So, so in terms of in terms of the work that you do, what, in terms of the work you do, and the current technology and current and the current technology offerings that you that are in currently in a space, what are some of the shortcomings, you know, are challenges that you've seen.

02:11
Alright, so, we work with a wide kind of swath of domains, right. So across clean energy, energy optimization, mobility, carbon tech, plastic waste, climate smart agri, and industry, advanced industry, right. So anything which has a either decarbonisation focus or circular economy focus, sorry, all adaptation and resilience, focus, you know, all of them are different stages of maturity as sectors in India, right. So the markets are different stages of development technologies within them are also 10 different stages of development, and then some kind of drilling down. So we have sectoral development, we have technology development, and then we have the product level development, so everyone has their own challenges. But, broadly, if you look at general challenges that, that, that startups or founders face, and just stop me just enough, I'm answering the wrong question. But we want to understand what startups faces challenges right. In, in our environment. So, one, yeah, so one is, of course, typically, startups in this space, have longer product development cycles, and also sales cycles. Right? Now, product development cycles being a result of oftentimes these beings, sometimes hardware or hardware plus software, so digital plus hardware software, so naturally, and this is more true for deep tech startups. And more and more, we're seeing deep tech startups if your business model innovation is different, but that's one. The other is, as I mentioned, the sales cycle is also longer, because many, I mean, the majority are at the start, as we see a b2b. Some are big, and some are b2c. But b2b sales cycle in general, are longer, right. The other thing for the for the sector as a whole. You know, both founders, and investors need to have some understanding of technology, and they need to have some domain expertise is not as simple as creating a, for example, such an app, you know, relatively simple thing to do, but of course, hard to scale. But you need domain expertise, both on the founders and the investor. So that's a general challenge for the ecosystem, you know, but increasingly, we're seeing higher quality entrepreneurs coming into the space, we're seeing more specialized pools of capital being raised on the investment side. So that's a positive we need much more of it. It goes without saying there's a little, little bit much more I mean, a little bit as compared to perhaps, you know, some of the other parts of the world. There is a little bit more scattered. Do of early stage risk capital. So when you're starting out non dilute of capital, that's not as as valuable. So that's the other thing that we are trying to solve. Let's see where that goes. Things are changing. So we have, I will say, On the positive side, I think in terms of rural startups, India's three number three in the world, in terms of climate status, we are number nine, I guess. But if you consider Europe has already probably number four. So it's it's green shoots. It's interesting, where we're managing to attract more capital and the right kind of entrepreneurs, but much more needs to be done.

05:41
Okay. Yeah. So whenever, whenever you're looking for, whenever these startups are looking for investments, we spoke briefly about this. And they're doing pitches, you know, what, what value do you see in in the increased transparency of the things they're doing within the within the sustainability space within the climate action space within all of these different spaces for kind of validation?

06:11
Yeah, I mean, that's a good question. That's, I mean, that it's kind of at the root of what we do. When we do evaluation and due diligence, right of startups, you don't know, the claims that startup makes, can we validate it? Whether the technology claims whether their business claims, either, right, so what do I mean by that? So if there's it's a new technology, and they say this can help improve efficiency by x, we need to validate that right. Now, do we validate that either we go to a third party validation service, we go to a lab that can certify it? We could all regulator that can certified right? We go to also customers? There's nothing like that, right? That's the best. Even even before any of this, if the customers tell us that, yes, this technology has helped me save money, or it'll improve my bottom line. That's validation. Right. So that's something we focus on very strongly is customer validation or market validation, right. Something more granular is, when we evaluate startups, we want to make sure that the things they're telling us on the business side, their growth rates, their whether it's on revenue, profitability, right, or, sorry, or customer conversion, all of those things. They're genuine, they're valid, right? And this is dynamic data, it gets updated all the time, right, you're growing as a company. So that's the other thing that we want is the ability to update data on a regular basis. Right. So we need transparency and validation of claims. That the status may we need regular updation of data. And that has to be again, revalidated, right. So it's a ongoing and dynamic process. And imagine this happening across hundreds and eventually 1000s of, you know, complex businesses. So one example that we spoke about was the idea of creating this data sharing platform where, for example, a startup needs to apply for grants, it needs to apply for investment, equity, or it needs to apply for that capital to a bank. Or it needs to apply to an accelerator, or it needs to, for example, do a sales pitch, get impaneled by a corporate, for example, right. All of this requires them to share data, about their business, about the technology, share information on cost benefit analysis, they've done all the customer value revenue, all of this. And oftentimes, this is a repeated game, you know, because it has to be done over and over again, right. It's almost like the administrative part of anyone's job that no one likes to do, you know, if you can automate some of that, and we have the world has automated a lot of this in the last decade. But it hasn't happened so much in this data space. So we're trying to we're trying to build a data sharing platform that allows startups to create a blog profile, and then start to apply through that almost like what LinkedIn does for recruitment. You know, so that's a good analogy. And that's, that's something that would benefit by increased transparency and to some extent also in Yeah, the the inability to fudge. Yeah, numbers and data. So I think that's, that's one. Yeah, I hope kind of this. This is one use case that I can think of. Yeah,

09:49
yeah. Cuz you brought up you brought up three different things that I kind of want to go down. So So whenever you say that you have third party validation and validation of regulators So, within the blockchain space, we have something referred to as Oracle's. So Oracle's essentially pretty much third party. So you're familiar with Oracle's,

10:11
I mean, in the matrix context or something else.

10:14
So within within blockchain, they have Oracle's where you have, you can actually, you can actually take off chain data and validate it and bring it on chain. So you can have a third party that goes in and actually validates validate certain things. Now, if you were to have, if you so I'm asking, Do you think that you could have a group of these third party validators to come in and be Oracle's and to kind of be incentivized to validate the data on chain or certain organizations, let's just hypothetically, these organizations were putting this information on chain, you know, we are trying to get funding and then you have Oracle's that are coming from from a third party like a group and they're incentivized to say, Okay, we'll give you $5,000 to go in and validate this for this $10 million deal. Right. Sure. Do you think that's Do you think that's gonna be that would be like, feasible?

11:11
Um, I mean, of the bad I think so it's the same. I mean, just to understand just to get my mental framework, right, it's similar work, what you're doing off chain, the differences. You're doing it on chain? Correct?

11:26
Yeah, so yeah, the information, there's no, it's like, let's just say, hypothetically, we have we have we're doing a carbon offset, a carbon offset tracking, you know, solution own chain, right, a refi or refi. Platform on chain, right, with a pitch, right? And they're pitching, and they're going in, and they're and they're validating, you know, with a third party, whether or not their claims are indeed accurate. But some of that is off chain, for example. Right, right. So those third party validators actually go would go on chain and say, Yes, this information is indeed valid. And there's just two startups claiming,

12:09
yeah, got it? No, I think Yeah. I mean, I don't see why. It wouldn't it couldn't happen. So. Okay. Yeah. I think maybe a transition period where people get used to the idea of it, but this is big business, as you know, validation, and certification. Right. So if if the same business continues on chain, as more streamline offers greater transparency, right. Yeah, I think so.

12:39
Okay. Then another thing, another thing we're talking about? Because because this whole, this whole funding thing is very interesting, you know, because, you know, usually, and this comes from my previous experience, where you have the social impact investors, and social impact investors are still they're still looking for they're still looking forward, they're still looking for a return on investment. Right. So, yeah, so have you seen Do you do you have, because there are some, there are some tools in different countries, where you can actually do crowdfunding type type type options, right? Do you see do you one do you? Do you deal with any kind of crowdfunding type type solutions within this space? And do you see that you see that type of option growing within within the social impact? area?

13:29
Yeah, no, absolutely. In fact, this is a this is an area of great interest to us. We have a platform ourselves, where we pull in capital from what we call what we call retail investors, right? So these are typically salaried people, they could be angels, etc, who invest much more, they're also interested in investing small amounts. So the equivalent of let's say, 4000 us up to 10,000. Us 12,000. Us? Yeah. So they put in these kind of check sizes, we pull that capital in, in alternative investment fund, vehicle, and then deploy onwards. So there's only one entry on the cap table. It's not like before 40 people come into the it's very difficult for startups. By the way, if 40 People who crowdfund come on to the cap table, at least this is the situation in India, right? Because I'm sure it's the same in most places. Because the reason is, later stage funders and later stage investors don't like too many people on the cap table, even capitalization table of a startup. It's better to use a pooling vehicle. And that's what we're doing. We're using pulling vehicle, getting funds from the crowd. Of course, you still have to meet certain criteria of being an ineligible investor. And then deploying, right so I'm aware that this can be done through the blockchain. I'm not aware whether the regulatory framework is that amenable using you know, da O's or blockchain based Kryptos as a way to raise money off, because then, you know, the markets regulator will step in? If. So, I know what's happening, for example, and it may happen elsewhere. There's there's some jurisdiction, which do allow pooling enough capital like this using the blockchain. And once this pool, then it can kind of flow into another country, because then it's coming from, let's say, a private limited or LLP or something. So that's, that is that's that's possible. But in India to do to kind of summarize, yes, crowdfunding does happen. We pull into a no specialized vehicle and deploy into startups. Okay. Not so easy on the blockchain yet.

15:45
Excellent. So I know, I know, we, you know, I actually brought up the actually brought up the concept of refi regenerative finance, and you said that you were you were familiar with that, you know, can you share your Can you share your thoughts on that? And, and and talk about whether or not do you think it has any legs in the future?

16:08
Yeah, I mean, again, it's not something that I've, you know, that I've delved into too deeply. However, I do believe that this is this is an interesting kind of financial mechanism specially for what we call nature based projects, right? So whether it's a forestation, right? Or it's regenerative agriculture, right. So, these I mean, of course, it's being used for several things. And I do know that for example, d phi is also used with NF T's, but specifically, sorry, Rifai, I do believe that NBS, I mean, what we call nature based solutions. That's the that's the kind of low hanging fruit here. Again, this is not something that we have seen too many use cases or examples of in India, we are exploring it with some people. Were kind of leading the effort in this space in India. But yeah, that's my limited understanding of this. We currently very much on the traditional finance space, we go to LPS HN eyes and family offices and all of that, you know?

17:26
Mm hmm. Excellent. Excellent. So, so whenever you whenever you're talking about so in terms of family offices, this is this is an interesting topic, too. So when you're talking about family offices, do you see a lot of family offices trying to get in trying to enter into this into this space? Or your trial? Or is it more of like an education piece? And then you're trying Aquaman to getting into this space? Like which way? Which way? Which way? Is it?

17:53
Yeah, that's a good question. And then you said this space, you are done with climate, right? Not the blockchain space, right. Climate Plan, right. Yeah. Okay, good. So mixed bag, right. There's in like, everything you have, you have the progressive guys, your early adopters, you're the progressive guys. By and large, there's a huge interest in climate, that, that that's something I can say pretty categorically right. Now, whether people actually putting money on the table. That's, that's why I say it's a mixed bag. Right. But everyone is interested. So we work with family offices in, in a number of ways, exactly what you said. So one is on the awareness building. Second is on education. And the third is on the actual fundraising, you know, so depending on which kind of stage they are in the learning curve, and, and in the risk appetite. Especially because at least in our case, we're we're playing in the early early stage, you know, please see these a stage. Right. So some family offices who do play in the same stage are looking at climate seriously. In fact, for the first fundraiser, I think most of Yeah, most of our LPS will be Indian domestic family offices, and Chennai is, you know, so there's sufficient interest here. And sufficient capital, I think, and keep in mind, Justin, that there's, like, in the US, and in the EU, there's a similar kind of intergenerational wealth transfer happening, right. The younger generation is oftentimes kind of more aligned. You know, perhaps I don't want to use that word, but let me anyway, but like values and profit, right, of course, the good business stewards, but they want to make sure that they're doing the right thing and oftentimes these guys like the environment, as a sector, you know, in Klamath Falls squarely in that. So yeah, mixed bag, definite interest all around, some people already acting. Some people are waiting and watching but Yeah, most most people we speak to say, no, no one says no. Short answer. Okay. All right.

20:07
So so because I know, I know, the United I know, the US, the US is putting more regulation in terms of adding adding transparency for public companies when it comes to climate. And so I haven't really, because that just happened last March. So I did not I haven't done any research in terms of India. So my question is, you know, what type of regulation is is happening is happening in India, where they're kind of requiring organizations to, to make their make their data and you know, their greenhouse gas emission? I like that making that transparent to investor. Yeah.

20:47
Public? No, no, no, that's a good question. So we have something that's the market regulator in court is called Sebby, the security and Securities and Exchange Board of India, they have introduced the business Responsibility and Sustainable reporting framework. Right. And that is India's ESG reporting framework ESG auditing and rating framework for listed companies right. Now, very recently, in fact, I was reading, I think it's Feb. So yeah, maybe end of November, something is when there was news that they were. We were planning to simplify it because, you know, I mean, I think this is sometimes a challenge with ESG. That reporting is not that simple, to put in baselining, methodologies and data collection and all of that, and sometimes that becomes its own beast. So I think it's a good step. But yeah, I mean, to, to kind of share, the BR SR is our ESG reporting framework, all listed companies need to comply. The second thing is, I think we were doing this research, there's about 139, Indian corporates. And this is this couldn't be better at data. Because this is four months ago, I did this research. So about 139 corporates, Indian corporates have signed up to some public commitment to decarbonize, right. Perhaps the CDP has BT e v 100, or 100. Any one of these? Right? So that's also a nice kind of critical threshold of slightly listed companies that perhaps a few unlisted that are made public pledges, you know? Yeah, so this is happening. We have the Indian railway, which is the largest employer of people in the world. That's made a net zero pledge by 2030. So there are things which are happening on the Net Zero side, on the ESG, reporting and auditing side, which are linked of course and on on decarbonisation in general, and decarbonisation across scope, one, two, and three, scope three, the hardest. We're doing, for example, just to share, we're doing a program, which we call climate challenges that's working with, you know, a subset of these large 139 corporates. And the idea is to start working with them send signals over time to throughout the supply chain. Right. And along the supply chain, of course, as you know, is is comprised of, like SMEs, small or medium enterprises. So that sends signals over time. I mean, this is a medium to long term goal. But, you know, these signals are powerful enough for hopefully they'll lead to SME decarbonisation is what we mean.

23:38
Okay, excellent, excellent. Yeah, this this conversation was very, very, very interesting. I have a lot of notes that I need to, I need a value to follow up on a lot of things that I didn't I didn't know about. So that's the that's the power of this. That's the that's the power this of this technology, this technology, where we just hop will hop on a zoom call and just zoom in and share our thoughts. So thank you for your time. And we'll do next time.

VeChain Foundation Climate Research - Justin Goldston & Deborah Dull, Genpact VP SCM Sustainability
Video Link - https://youtu.be/_Gt0Zub9UTo

Absolutely. Thanks for having me on. I love supply chain, it's my most favorite topic within their inventory is is a near and dear to my heart topic. And I hear we get to talk about that a little bit today. What I do during the day, I work at a company called Genpact, I'm their global supply chain sustainability, lead, and nights, weekends, afternoons, I lead a nonprofit called a circular supply chain network. I'm also for fun pursuing my doctorate in trying to figure out the relationship between supply chain and the economy. Eight years from now, I should know the answer. So I'll report back then.

00:55
Yeah, we didn't talk about that went blind. Yeah, so. So I know, I know. You know, we've we've had our we've had our conversations in previous interviews about about, you know, blockchain and sustainability and the and the things that come up in the industry. So can you kind of share your thoughts in terms of, you know, if you think that it was, Do you think that organizations would adopt the tracking of carbon emissions on the blockchain? And also, do you even think it's feasible? Oh,

01:32
I would not advise them to do so. And I think it's feasible, but I don't think it's the best solution. And I'll unpack that a little bit. I know in your supply chain era, you're blockchain skeptic. I think the blockchain technology is a remarkable thing for digital assets. It was originally invented to track digital assets in the form of currency tokens. When translated to the physical world, we have some misalignment of problems that we're trying to solve. I think blockchain fundamentally helps to resolve chain of custody, understanding what is the truth, and democratization of whatever it is that we're trying to track. Fantastic. Those are not normally the shortlist of problems that supply chains have in trying to track something through a network. So I don't think it's actually the right tool to solve this problem. And we can unpack the problem in a little bit. But that's one challenge I'm seeing. The second challenge is that we don't have an accepted. It's not like the blockchain, just like there's no such thing as the cloud. There's a blockchain just like a cloud exists out in the world. So we're starting to see cross chain providers to try to get blockchain to talk to each other. I'm seeing hesitancy from one supply chain, oh, I don't want to be on their blockchain. So until we get this market figured out, I think ultimately, maybe a regulatory body from the US or EU or government will issue this is the blockchain to use for track and trace on this food or pharmaceutical or something like this. But for now, there's not a blockchain. And so there's, you do all this work to do a pilot on one blockchain type. And it turns out the same problem we had with the control towers, everybody's on a different version. So that part is hard. The third challenge, which is being actively worked on, I will acknowledge is that blockchain tends to be extremely energy, heavy, energy intensive. And I have not done the math on this. But I could suppose that depending on what you're tracking, you're going to end up expending more carbon for the energy just to fuel the validation of your data, then the thing that you're actually trying to track to begin with, so you end up sort of at a negative result to your problem. So those are the three big challenges, we can certainly unpack why carbon tracing is already difficult. But those are my couple of challenges. I would love to be challenged on me. I will change my mind if I hear good argument.

04:17
Now, you know, you know, you know, I'm a blockchain. Maxie and you put some good points, you know, you know, you did a good job if you shut me up.

04:29
So, I want to I want to expand on that. And I want to I want to kind of because I've actually touched on this yet in previous in previous discussions, but so what what are the what are the existing issues for tracking for tracking? Carbon?

04:45
Yep, current state. Absolutely. So here it goes today. If you're unfamiliar, a bunch of people that a lot of math to figure out, generally speaking, the greenhouse gas emissions from a given thing, whether it's $1, or a pound of steel, cotton, whatever it is, they have guesstimate that they're called emission factors or conversion factors. And there's standard tables that you can access, multiply that by what's in your supply chain. And you are meant to get a directional idea of what's happening, your supply chain, great. That's today's sort of baseline best approach. The challenge with this approach is go to any supply chain professional, present this to them as their baseline. And then they're going to ask cool, how can I impact this number and reduce it. But if we're using internationally accepted, standard table, standard factors, you can't do anything really to change that. And so you're going to turn off supply chain folks our entire life is how do we unstick variable costs variable time variable anything to do more and have it cost us less, less time, whatever the case is. So this, I think, is a challenge to the fundamental fabric of a supply chain professional one, to a lot of supply chains are working really hard to transition their warehouses and factories and vehicles to renewable energy sources may be on site energy production through solar panels, reusable industrial packaging, they're trying to do all the right things. But these factors don't capture that. So how do we do something different? Of course, we can just try to track actual carbon through the supply chain super easy, right? Wrong. So it is estimated that about 15% of supply chains can see their tier two suppliers. That is my suppliers supplier, only 15% can see those. Then about 2% or less, it's a debated number of between two and 5% or less, fewer supply chains can see past here to put this in perspective. Cars typically are about 20 tiers, from car to planet. So any any supply chain, you've got think eight to 14 tiers is a pretty fair guesstimate for how many tiers you need to go. So this is a problem. Because if we're supposed to know the carbon flow, we at least need to understand the physical path that our materials are taking first. So first things first, we got to figure out actually what's in our network. That's really hard to figure in our supplier, supplier, supplier supplier, that by itself is really hard. Watching cannot help solve that problem. That is a different fundamental problem. We built our supply chains for cost and time. Sometimes for quality, we did not build them for transparency of partners. We love multi sourced supplier strategies because it gives us resilience, we say great, multiply that by every tier, we have in every supplier of every tier having multiple suppliers on multiple tiers. And we've got ourselves a massive network. That's a living, breathing organism that we don't know who it is. So that's one problem, then, let's imagine we try to then figure out the material flow through that network. It's going to vary sometimes by day, sometimes a month, maybe twice a year. But those supplier suppliers are going to shift and change based off of price and quality and availability and disaster recovery and something happened, there's a labor strike, all of a sudden, you have to go to your second third fourth choice supplier. So the flow of material through our networks is already very difficult to do. There have been lots of pilots doing this with Blockchain technology so that all of the paperwork and everything that goes along with it can be done diamonds, vanilla coffee, we've seen these, even the emissions from the leather in a Jaguar Land Rover car has been written to a blockchain to try to attempt to capture this. That's great, but that means they had to go all the way back and do all the work, find our suppliers, find the material flow. And then here comes the real Zinger, estimate the carbon impact or emissions impact at each and every stop along the way. So that means in the case of leather, not only the cow, but what was the cow fed? How was that wheat grown? What was the fertilizer source? How did it get to the cow? That's just the cow? Then we got to figure out where does it go? How is it treated? How was it processed with the entire supply chain to the car and out finally gets to you. Each of those activities has an emissions impact. We don't have a solid handle on how to do that. On the flight today.

09:33
If we can get those three pretty impossible elements sorted out. Yeah, let's

09:39
write it to the blockchain. Perfect. Let's do it. And then it can be handed off I don't mean to make light of it. Because we have regulations up ahead of us and ultimately will hand over log into a blockchain or some system to a regulator so that they can see audit what we've done, but we don't have to give away our secret sauce. It doesn't need to be publicly available to anyone. that is going to be a great solution. But we have a lot of upfront work to do first, before the system even matters. I'll pause.

10:11
That was amazing. Because there was a bunch of various things I hadn't even thought about you have a you have you have you have an excellent point where it is going to be almost impossible to track the carbon emissions of X. I'm thinking about I'm thinking about the Cal scenario. You're absolutely right. Jesus Christ. Yeah. The guy carbon emissions for the transportation guy Trent, the transportation for the cat to the to the to the slaughterhouse, the processing the heart to the manufacturing facility, how much did the manufacturing facility use? Totally crap, I didn't think about

10:47
that. Which grid? does it sit on? What's the energy source? How much did they use that leave a valve on that they keep the lights on high? I mean, there's so many variables to this. And there are technology solutions to start to break this down along the supply chain. They're nascent in some ways. In other ways, well, us building management solutions and light efficiency and all that kind of stuff is well in use. But we don't really look at it in this way to say, what's our running, and I'm gonna use the word ledger of carbon that we're putting into the hide in an embedded carbon type of a manner. And we do need a running ledger, we do need a running total, so that we can hand that off almost like a carbon price list, but it needs to be dynamic. And we hand that off then to our customer so that they can keep that along the way, those parts of a blockchain type technology. Absolutely, we're going to need it. But right now, I don't even know what it is we would write to the blockchain. There's just so many open questions up ahead of time.

11:49
Okay. So that's a good point.

11:55
Open questions. So in your opinion, one, what are the open questions that need to be answered? What are the research questions that need to be answered? Right? And to? If you're, if you're responsible for that, what would be like that implementation strategy? What would be the roadmap for this?

12:15
Really good questions. I think at this simplest level, we need to understand what is often called a carbon intuition. This is taught to me by the founder of a company called Jorah, which is a consumer facing emissions impact app, very cool app. But the same way that you look at a plate of broccoli and a plate of pizza. And you know, that one is much higher calorie count than the other. We don't have that intuition built for carbon today, we're not really sure if a turn on a light or turn on a blender, or drive my car. What's really the most carbon intensive we it's hard for us to get our heads around, we've just not been taught it. So I think fundamentally, the research question is what is the emissions impact of a given activity in supply chain? We are the stewards, The Guardian Angels have materials of inventory, but also a resources of the consumables, the lubricants, everything that goes into a factory, a warehouse, a vehicle, pallets, anything like that. That's not us. We're the ones who decide anything about it. We'd haven't really looked at carbon, but we can in a very similar way. So go back to my intro about seeing inventories. My favorite we're going to talk about that today. Because I predict we'll start to look at carbon very much like we look at inventory today. And instead of a problem, I think we'll start to look at carbon like a resource. And the big question is, is it going to sit on our balance sheet like working capital, like inventory? Like capital equipment, like an asset that we keep track of, or a liability because we're going to be taxed on it? And the answer is probably somewhere among all of those. But we're starting to see very interesting companies take carbon from someplace the most efficient way to do this is to capture it at the source, the point of emission. So whether it's industrial emissions, or there's a really cool company called Remora. That takes it out of the semi trucks. I'm shocked that not every truck has this already retrofitted on 80% captured out of the emissions wonderful. They take this carbon you get it from from the air, it's very inefficient, it's really expensive, but they're working on making that better. And then they're turning that carbon into materials like a really, really hard, really robust plastic. Imagine, because plastic after all is just carbon. It's fossil fuels. It's just carbon. And we can treat carbon like a building material, which I think is ultimately the way that we're going to do this like if you look around the room, wherever you are right now, unless it's glass or metal. It made out of carbon, we are carbon. That's what we are made out of. So I think ultimately, this will become a building material, but we haven't quite gotten the science to where it needs to be. So a very, very long winded way to answer your first question, but what is the emissions impact of a given activity? And I'm not sure there's anyone better placed than supply chain professionals to answer that question.

15:20
I forgot your second question, though.

15:25
So I was gonna say, you know, if you if you were to implement a strategy for this, what would be the implementation

15:33
that you wouldn't build up?

15:35
Absolutely. I think, you know, we most supply chains, most organizations now have a pretty good handle about what happens inside their four walls, I think we need to slightly expand our definition of our four walls and start to imagine when something is inside of our custody, what do we add on to that growing ledger? And so again, for folks in supply chain, if we think about somebody like our contract manufacturers, I would consider that inside of our custody, even though my greenhouse gas protocol standards, that scope three, I would still consider that within our realm of control, we'll call. So whenever a material comes into our control, we need to understand what we add to that carbon ledger and put that someplace, maybe it could be a blockchain solution, potentially, in the future. Today, I think there's a lot of ways that we can track information through existing controls our solutions, to say, here's what I added on. And we start to imagine, again, this idea of like a carbon or an emissions price list, it's ultimately going to take everyone doing that. And the expectation that along with an actual price list, you get an estimated carbon price list, this is just going to have to be how we get an idea of one supplier or another supplier. We can estimate it today, again, through factors but I think we can start to get pretty smart about estimating the material flow through a network. And then estimating the carbon impact of that as it goes, it's going to take some machine learning models. But I think it's possible with the technology we have today. So that we can start to get a good idea of what it is we're handing off to our customers. So this implementation guide, I think it has to come with this idea of a carbon intuition that's translated into an estimated carbon price list. And then perhaps there's some, when you deviate from that price list more, you know, plus or minus 5%, you need to disclose that to your customers, so that they know it. And again, ultimately, ultimately speaking, the solution will come from regulatory bodies, let's call it from the US government says anything that's happening in the US here is the solution. At that point, I think we will be ready for blockchain because it'll be a single system regulated. There very clear standards for what needs to be added at which point along the the process and secret decoder key only goes to regulators who needs to see it, it's not going to be accessible by very many people. So I think ultimately, that that's where we're gonna get. But to start with, I think this kind of taking care of what's in your control thinking about it in a way of like a chain of custody type of an idea.

18:26
So So you're saying it, so you said that we're gonna have like a secret decoder key for them and for this information, so you don't you don't think, you know, go in with a definition of blockchain? Because they we do have, you know, public and private changes. Right. But But ultimately, you don't think that this information is going to be transparent to to consumers?

18:48
I think, ultimately, it's good to disclose. Certainly, yes, I think it shouldn't be. I think it should be transparent, I don't think the entire supply chain should be transparent. Because we start getting into IP, I think it should look similar to a list of ingredients on the back of food or a more robust version of a made in China tag on clothes, it needs to be more robust than this. And we also need to be realistic that changing artwork on packaging is not a dynamic thing. So either we need to have estimates, or it needs to be printed, like like, batch numbers, expiration date, so then we need another little print that says actual emissions on this specific pack of Oreos or bottle of beer. This this is the actual emissions from this and I think we can get there. We'll buying decisions based off of it maybe, but I think, you know, kind of backup package front of package ideas front of package could be the brand promise of we'll never go over x, the missions, and that's the front of package bragging right and then you can flip it over or to say this specific lot? Or this how this package came through a process in a different way. Ultimately, I think we're leaving it there. And I think we can compete on it for some period of time, then I think supply chains will be shorter, and everybody gets better. But that's my Nirvana state that I live in, in my head.

20:17
Yeah, yeah, like that. Because whenever you're mentioning that I'm envisioning like a QR code. I'm envisioning a QR code, you can scan and then that kind of if it goes on the blockchain, then that's gonna be an NFT. Right? Always say that you've heard of NF T's. But you know, if it has a serial number, have a bat, if it has a serial number, it has a badge numbers gonna be NF T on the blockchain, right? So you can scan that QR code, a Red Cross represented NFT. And then it shows all that all those carbon emissions, actually like that. That was yours. You can trademark that one. So last question I have last question I have is, how long do you think is going to take? Because we're both on the same page that regulations come in, right? How long do you think is going to take or they're going to be stored on this and talking about it for a number of years are you think it's like right around the corner, in terms of in terms of publishing this information?

21:15
Who publishing a decade. regulatory pressure, it's here now. So if you look at again, I'll use the EU because they're a bit further ahead. They already have a battery focused digital product passport requirement that's already out, they have a carbon border adjustment mechanism to tax embedded carbon already out reporting sort of last month for both of those. But they give a three year runway for people to figure it out. So taxation starts 2026. So we're already in the kind of get ready mode, are reporting is meant to be starting now. But you won't really get dinged for it for a couple of years. So I think we'll give the b2b world a couple of years to get it figured out and feel confident about their data. And then it'll be exposed to the consumer. I don't think it's going to be earlier than five years. I'd be delighted if it was eight, but I think it'll be probably about a decade.

22:12
I'm trying to go through my notes, because there was one comment that I had in another interview, where it was kind of a dystopian view, where, you know, you're talking about you talked about b2b, you know, carbon carbon tracking and carbon tax. But there's been talks about being taxed on the individual basis, in terms of your carbon usage. Right. Now, do you think now again, do you think that? Do you think that

22:47
that's something that could be coming?

22:50
Or do you think that that's just talk because I begin, I think there's a little dystopian view of things?

22:55
I think, and this isn't my last question, because I gotta run. My, I don't believe I think we put a lot of pressure on consumers. I think they we are all functioning an economy that we did not choose to be in my plug for the circular economy really launched, like the linear economy today that we're in really launched Christmas Eve 1924, when a bunch of business owners decided to cap the light of a light bulb, and actually make it a worse product, so that they can make more money. That was the first known meeting where it was mentioned about Planned obsolescence. That's really the economy that we know today started that day, none of us chose to be in that economy. But here we are. Most of what we recycle gets thrown away. Anyway, most of our individual decisions, please, please don't ever want to get sad about this. But municipality wise, we are not going to make or break things, I think the big impact is going to be in b2b industry upstream. So that's the area that we need to fix individual carbon taxation, I think should have already been taxed upstream to whoever it is, who's producing the items, the choices they make, and the energy sources that they use to do whatever process they have. That's a place to tax, I do think if you have a choice for your home, to have a subsidized solar panel installed, in, in collaboration with your government, and that's a choice for you. Phenomenal, then definitely choose that as long as it's not going to ding the consumer, and they're going to have to spend more money on that. But in terms of pressure for consumers, or that we're all going to be taxed? I don't think that's fair to the individual consumer.

24:36
Excellent. I agree with that. So yeah, so Debra, thank you. Thank you for your time. Where can people were configurable people find you. Oh,

24:44
find me on LinkedIn. It's the best way I do actually right back. And you can also check me out at the circular supply chain Network website. We get together once a while we're a group of nerds who have conversations not dissimilar to this one on a regular basis and you're welcome to join us.

25:00
All right Deborah thank you thank you once again and everyone else until next time

VeChain Foundation Climate Research - Justin Goldston & Tom Raftrey - Tech Evangelist & Influencer
Video Link - https://youtu.be/T69qu5vOgCI

Sure, happy to Thanks, Justin. So this is a space I've been in actively for 15 years at least maybe a little more. I got into a profession it was it was always an area of interest because I'm a biologist by training. Even though I work in the technology space, now, I went I did biology in university went on. While studying for a PhD in biology, I was doing a PhD on biological control. I never quite finished it because I got distracted by technology. And there was a whole lot more money to be made on the technology field than there was in biology, but it's always there in my heart. You know, I'm a biologist and a technologist and my two passions. So I got into the kind of energy and sustainability space in around 2006. Professionally when I got to design and build out a data center in Cork in Ireland, where I lived at the time, and we completely optimized the data center for energy efficiency, we made it a hybrid energy efficient data center, because we wanted to be as low carbon as possible. And I started giving a lot of talks about that at the time, and got a name for myself in the green energy space. And then after that, I was taken on by an industry analyst firm to head up their arm, which dealt with energy and sustainability. So I led research in that and we turned that organization green monk and I led that for seven years. And then I was recruited into SAP in 2016 as an IoT evangelist, but I had a heavy kind of side of sustainability in that as well. So I've been working really at the kind of the intersection of technology and sustainability for Well, since 2016. However many years that is, I'm terrible at maths. Sorry, sorry. 2006. So that's what that's 17 years. 17 years. Yeah,

02:17
that's, that's that's a while. So a whole lot her a lot earlier than then there were a lot of people were talking about in terms of sustainability whenever they want to happen, the sustainability bandwagon, you know, right before COVID.

02:29
It coincides with the Al Gore's Inconvenient Truth movie that came out around that time as well, which did raise an awareness of the issue back around the 2006 timeframe. But then with the economic crash in 2008, it all went away again, and it only started to bubble back up again after Paris in 2015, I think.

02:51
Okay, excellent. So, so I know before, thank you for that. I know, before, you know, our discussion, you know, we I asked a question about, you know, what, what work you've done in terms of carbon emissions and carbon credits and carbon offsets, and you said that you, you interviewed a couple of interesting people on your podcast. Can you expand on that a little bit? Sure. Yeah.

03:13
So I have two podcasts, I have one called the digital supply chain podcast. And I like to have a bit of a focus on sustainability in that. And I've, in that I've talked to several blockchain companies, in fact, who are in the space of, you know, visibility for things, be it agriculture and visibility of food, those kinds of things. And then I have a second podcast, which is the climate confident podcast. And in that I've done a lot around, well, the whole aim, or the mission statement, which is very lofty term, I guess, of the climate confident podcast is to highlight successful emissions reduction stories and strategies to kind of excite people and inspire them to take action as well. So in that space, I have talked to people who are in the, the offset space definitely and obviously the emission space.

04:16
Interesting, interesting. So so based on his discussion

04:20
of last year, audio just when I'm not hearing you, do you hear me hear me now? I'm gonna try something here. Yeah.

04:33
What about what about now?

04:35
Yep. Can you hear me now? Can you hear me the whole time? Yeah, I

04:39
hear your hotel. Okay, good. Okay.

04:42
I can hear you again. It was I think a loose cable on my on the side of my machine there.

04:46
Okay. So based on based on those interviews based on your experiences, what would be what would be some of the challenges, what will be some of the challenges also what will be some of the benefits to tracking carbon emissions carbon credits or carbon offsets on the blockchain, in your opinion.

05:08
Yeah, so they're very different. So tracking carbon emissions is something that every organization is going to have to do. It's it's going to be regulated. The SEC came out with proposals last year that all publicly traded companies would have to start reporting their emissions from 2024, depending on the size, large ones first, and then smaller ones after that, but in by 2025, all publicly traded companies will have to report their emissions. Now, these were proposals that the SEC, but they haven't come into force yet. They were put out for discussion. But it was it talks to a direction of travel because you have similar regulations bubbling up in Europe as well. And at all, as we get closer to 2030. And we're not getting our emissions reductions targets by 2030, that's going to start to become more and more of an issue. And we will soon start to see every region start to require companies to report their emissions. And of course, to report your emissions, you need to be tracking them. So this is going to be a big thing. Absolutely. tracking and reporting mission is going to be huge. In fact, the SEC in their proposals last year said that the the reporting would have to be out to scope three, and they would have to be audited. So, you know, all the big accounting firms are rubbing their hands with Lee, and everyone is kind of scratching their heads because no one knows yet how to report out to scope three, those standards haven't been in place. So there's a lot of people talking about that and trying to come up with standards for that reporting. The offsets piece is different, and it's more challenging. If reporting of the scope three wasn't challenging enough, the offsets one is even more challenging, because it's hard to track. But also there's a huge amount of greenwashing going on in that space. And that's going to be one of the hardest ones. And it's not just the greenwashing it's also the quality of the offsets. I mean, if I invest in offsets, in a forest in the Amazon, and there's a wildfire, and it burns down, you know, what happens to my offsets are, you know, a forest in California doesn't have to be the Amazon or Southeast Asia, you know, and it gets logged illegally, you know, that, you know, there you go the offsets up in smoke as it were. So these kinds of things mean that a lot of the offsets are of questionable quality, I guess, or could potentially be. And so the verification and tracking of those is going to be really, really, really important. And the forestry ones are some of the most dubious, I would say there are others, though enhanced weathering, for example, is one and some of the nature based solutions that that you know, are around investing in biodiversity, for example, they're an interesting as well, they're a lot harder to measure. But they are ones that have a greater potential outcome. Now, as I say, the measurement of that is very challenging. There. I don't think there's any agreed standard around measuring biodiversity, for example. So that's going to be a hard one to track. There's been some great stuff coming out of the IMF and Rob Shami, who's an assistant director of the IMF, in particular, on the on putting a monetary value on the carbon sequestration services that are performed by the likes of whales and elephants, forest elephants. And that's an interesting one. He's working with an organization called rebalance Earth to try and do that on a blockchain. They're working with the Gabon, the country, Gabon. They're working with the government there, too. Put a financial value on the carbon sequestration services performed by elephants, forest elephants in the Gabon, and then allow companies to invest in those track it on a blockchain and make sure that the money goes to projects in the area to help local communities as opposed to going into the pockets of politicians.

09:41
Yeah, so I just I just received, I just received a thank you for that. I just received a text through LinkedIn and what am I? What am I what am I researching piers David Daniel, Daniel critica. From from coin coin Bureau you're watching shout out But he sent me a message yesterday, more than 90% of rain forest carbon offsets by biggest certifier Vera are worthless.

10:10
That's right. Yeah, I saw that that report came out last week or the week before. And that's that talks about I'm talking about, a lot of times, if you're investing in forest offsets, it could be for the forest that was never going to be cut down. Anyway, that was there was an existing one. You know, and there's a lot of dubious claims made about the the forestry ones. So you, I mean, the the the organization, there was supposed to be a, an organization that verified and had a good name. And suddenly, it turns out 90% of their offsets are worthless is probably a strong term, but of dubious quality. Certainly.

10:50
Yeah, yep. So yeah, and that's one thing we're trying to, we're trying to do our best in this in this area, but you're always gonna be, in my opinion, fighting the uphill battle, because, you know, there's there's financial, there's monetary gain, you know, in this area. So whenever you might, you might you made a point, you know, at the introduction, where, you know, there was more money to be made in the tech field, which is absolutely accurate. So, that leads me into another question of, given that because I can blockchain we have d phi, everybody goes over to d phi, because that's where all of my that's a financial incentive within within the blockchain space, right. There's a lot of money to be made in default. Right. So So there's also there's also a refi space that kind of looks in looks at that climate finance aspect to make a positive difference, right. So given that, you know, going back what you said, there's more money to be made in the tech space, there's more money to be made in defi. How could we convince people to move over to the refi area? Because there's more sustainable benefit? We can go deep all day long, but the world might not be here in 20 years, right? We need to go to the refi space, so we can have a world we live in. I mean, that's just my that's my that's my views. I mean, what's your thoughts on that?

12:12
Yeah, no, it's a good point. I think the global decarbonisation project that we're going to have to go through is the largest project humanity will ever, ever undertake, which means there's going to be truckloads of money, the likes of which we've never seen before go into it. So there's massive opportunity here for everyone. The important thing is to make sure that the money goes to the right types of projects. The first thing is, we need to decarbonize everything as much as possible. There are some industries where that's easier than others, the software industry is very simple to decarbonize, the glass, steel, aluminium, chemicals, industries, aviation industries, they're extremely difficult to decarbonize, and so far them, where they can't decarbonize, they will need to purchase offsets. But they'd have to get so the idea is to get as much carbon out of the system as possible, and for the remainder, use offsets and the offsets should be a place of last resort. And then those offsets need to be verifiable, they need to be able to show that they're not greenwash, they need to be able to show that they are actually beneficial. And with this is going to be for anyone that can do that. verifiably. Then I see there's a big market and that should be somewhere where the refi folks can say, look, we've got this space. It's a it's an enormous market, because even if I said it should be the place of last resort, the offsets, it's still a massive last resort. You know, it'll be the biggest financial undertaking the planet has ever seen or humanity has ever undertaken.

14:18
Yeah. And so, that was excellent answer, by the way. So, so, I spoke with I spoke with two people in this space. So I spoke with I spoke with Drew from spoke with Drew from, from clay, McDowell. And then I spoke with another individual, but one other individual from 2k and protocol. And they were saying that in terms of moving an entire industry, our entire space, from the web to world to the web three world. This climate finance is probably one of the only ones where you can move the entire because it's a three bit it's a two or $3 billion industry something like that, right? So you could actually move that whole entire, that whole entire carbon credit space on the blockchain, you can move on chain, right? Because there's just a small number of people that are controlling these things. And then you can work with those people because they actually do work with those people, and they can move the whole entire space on chain right now with, uh, with the real estate industry, global real estate industry, that will be impossible, right? But people are trying to do it. And then further, and also, it's gonna take a long, long time to actually do that, right. So if you're if we're able to move, you know, let's just say, you know, the carbon credit or the carbon credit tracking, if we're able to move that whole entire space on chain, do you think that we're going to minimize this whole greenwashing space? We're going to provide more value within this space? And if it's if it's if it's transparent, if it's transparent, do you think more money will pour in because now, everybody can see everything on chain?

16:03
That's the hope, isn't it? I mean, it is. Yeah, I mean, really, one thing to be aware of, though, Justin is yeah, it's it is only a, I think you said two or $3 billion industry today. Yeah. But it's at like miniscule numbers compared to where it needs to be. So the amount of I don't, I don't know the exact numbers, okay, but the amount of carbon that we're going to have to offset will be in the 10s of billions of tons per year. And we're doing maybe 10s of 1000s. Today, maybe maybe a million. So we have got to get from the maybe 1 million, maybe 2 million tonnes that we're doing today, up to literally 10s of billions of tonnes per year, we're going to make a significant impact. So this is a space that's going to grow enormously. And because it has a reputation for being mixed up with greenwashing. Absolutely, it needs to be it needs, it needs some mechanism, whether it's blockchain or something else, it needs some mechanism to show look, hey, we're 100% transparent, you can check every single aspect of this, you know, from start to finish. And if it if you can show that, then it starts to then its reputation starts to be repaired, and people are less dubious about stepping into the space.

17:44
So that's, that's a good, that's a good segue into into the last question, which I hope is last question. So given that, given that organizations primarily within the supply chain space, because that's that's the space that I play in, you know, given that they're going to be required to to publish, you know, their, their tracking in greenhouse gases and things like that. What do you think is going to be the digital transformation strategy, or the implementation path for large organizations as well as small and medium organizations?

18:24
It's good question. And it'll vary with different organizations and different industries. I did a an interview recently in my climate confident podcast with a guy called Luis Amaral. And Luis is the CEO of an organization called the science based targets initiative. And what they do is they're their nonprofit, they work with companies to say, you know, and any company can say, Ah, we're going to be net zero by 2050, or 2040, or whatever it is. And you know, you put that on your CSR report, and you put that on your annual report and everyone claps and then nothing happens. What the science based target initiative does is it works with companies to say, okay, baseline, this is where you are today in terms of emissions. Here's where you need to get to to be net zero, using science based principles. And they have different templates for different industries. And you work with them to roll to publicize the steps you're going to take to go from where you are today to being net zero by whatever date you set. Generally, it's around 2030. And you do verification steps for that pathway as well. And so it's things like this. It's setting science based targets. measuring and reporting against them is the most important thing organizations we We'll need to do and I'd be surprised if in the next few years, they're not mandated to do,

20:06
huh? Yeah, I can't know that. I know that we, we just updated. We just updated a Class A CSR class at Georgetown. So I'm actually an advisory board at Georgetown. And we were updating the CSR class and the director brought in brought in this whole aspect of science based targets where a lot of people with the cause like Georgetown, the government, governments, but it speaks with Georgetown a lot in terms of the research that's going on. And then the government actually brought in the idea of, you know, what you're doing in terms of science based target research? So that's one question that that that the that the government is bringing in, so you might have a good point where it may be required, you know, so

20:46
I think it will, I think, in some in some regions, certainly, I would be surprised if Europe doesn't bring in that legislation in the next two, three years. And depending, I guess, on the outcome of the next election in the US, it might happen there too.

21:01
Yeah. So so yeah. So that's pretty much all the questions that I had. This was very, very beneficial. So can you let everyone know where they can where they can find you?

21:13
Absolutely. So as you said at the start, my name is Tom Raftery. I have a website. Tom raftery.com. I have a Twitter account at Tom Raftery, easy to find on LinkedIn as well. There's not a lot of time. Raftery is on LinkedIn. I have my climate confident podcast and my digital supply chain podcast, both of which are available on any podcast app that you go to just look for digital supply chain podcast or climate confident podcasts and they'll come straight up.

21:41
And I would I would suggest that everyone log in or subscribe to those podcasts because they're absolutely amazing if you're in a sustainability or climate action space. All right. Thank you so

21:51
much. And Justin, you're an alumnus, Justin of the digital supply chain podcast. I had you on the podcast there a year or more back at this point, I think.

21:59
Yep. Yep. Yep. And that was that was that was one of the that was one of the great one of the best podcasts one of the best podcast may not be may not be the top viewed but you know what? You want to say it's number one, number one in our hearts. So thanks for your time.

22:17
Thank you so much. Awesome. Alright. See you everyone.

VeChain Foundation Climate Research - Justin Goldston Interviews Andi Stanner of Toucan Protocol
Video link - https://youtu.be/bERCJtmv_AA

Hey, everyone, this is Andy from from Touken protocol as you introduce me, I'm product leader to come protocol. So I'm looking into and after everything in anything around metal registries. So basically the way of tracking carbon across its lifecycle and also around all the product aspects that we have to bring harm on chain, which is what we call bridges. That's basically tokenizing assets, namely carbon credits at this point in time, and bringing it into the metal registry. And then later handing it over to our other departments that are looking into giving carbon credits more utility on chain, which is financial products, commodification, and, you know, utility beyond the retirement of carbon, because that is our hypothesis that with more of these utility aspects around carbon tokens, which is unique to the blockchain and web three, and what web three can do with carbon. Our hypothesis is that this is basically what's you know, what will be driving a huge wave of demands and what will become a a sink for carbon credits, which ultimately, obviously creates demand for new projects and new mitigation action. And this is all what do we want to do?

01:51
Excellent, thanks. Thanks for that. So so, you know, in my, in my initial research within within this space, you know, going back a while back, you know, this whole meta registry, you know, topic came up, can you can you define that for non natives? I think that would be that would be good.

02:09
Yeah. So today, what we have is we have a bunch of registries and standard programs, normally, it goes like this, and we standard program. So, basically a group of, well, scientists or experts will define what is a good carbon crediting project, and who also do the QA, or basically the find the guardrails for the QA into this, they also run a registry system, a ledger of, of carbon credits. So basically, when they be when are they being issued? Who are they being issued to? Who are they being transferred to? And who are they being retired by, and what kind of additional metadata and information all of these transactions happen. So one of the things that we have, obviously, from from this aspect is that we, when we do all of this in silos, and when we're trying to do tackle a global project, and the global problem, we have many, many projects, we have, we get really quickly into interoperability issues and into things like double counting, meaning like you count the same emission reduction or emission, if you will, you count it twice. Or you spend it twice, which will be double use. Because you have systems that don't talk to each other, for example, you have the same projects and two systems. Or you move one project to from one system to another, and you lose a lot of data in between. So this is a big issue on a inter governmental level. But this is also a big issue on the private sector level, which is the voluntary carbon market. Because none of these crediting standards are, you know, have an oversight overseeing body that is regulating all of that. We do that in the VCM. So the voluntary carbon market, you know, in a self regulatory, and pseudo regulatory way, and yet we still our systems are still not connected to each other. So we have a lot of friction there. We lose transparency along the way. It's very costly to then retro actively establish transparency. So looking in doing due diligence doing audits on where something from or is this the only registry that has this project, for example, can I safely spend the credits kind of rest assured for that? So we spend a lot of money and time on that. So an ideal scenario is of course, a, a tooling that would combine all of these and build prisons between these these silos. And what better infrastructure has there ever been than a system that can be run completely trustless and doesn't require any private entity, any administrator any anyone who could do human error or could go rogue or could go out of business and lose all records, what better system did we ever have then at this point in time, where we have public blockchains who or which can take all of this information and are practically built for this because every transaction has embedded value into it. So and that is exactly what transacting carbon credits is you transact value. And so these systems are made for it. And our purpose, as a matter of history is that we provide a way of having a a ledger system that is can can serve can serve all these purposes that normally a centralized entity would do, which will to be combined all of this we keep track of one at one place, basically, conceptually in one place. But with all the benefits of a decentralized system, which is we we go out of business doesn't matter, right. So we have no way of spending or erasing, erasing the history of a credit or spending and credit credit twice or help anyone, no matter how many trillions of dollars you put onto this ledger, we cannot, it's it's the safest it can get at this point. And that is why we believe, and increasingly many thankfully due so that we need a registry of registries basically. So a meta registry, where current assets can be tracked can be can live, basically, through all of their lifecycle. Excellent.

07:08
So So with this, so yeah, you mentioned you mentioned they, you mentioned a number of a few challenges, you know, outside of the challenges that you already mentioned, what other challenges do you see with with this with this type of of comment, finance adoption, within this space, you know, from the from the current web through space, and then in order to get these traditional web two companies to come over to web three, and try and try to utilize this this tool.

07:39
I think one of the main, the main friction points here is the, you know, guilt by affiliation. In a sense that there's a lot of prejudice against what web three is, and what's happening inside of web three, and there's a lot of focus on on like, a very minor fraction of, of the actual energy that's been put into this in a sense of that is that that is actual scams, or that is actually a net negative for, for the planet. And it's being portrayed onto, onto a system that is trying to solve something completely different with what is a perfectly neutral infrastructure and perfectly neutral technology. And I think there's a lot of, you know, educational effort to be made, and also regulatory clarity to be given. So that people are, and by people, I mean, companies mostly, are not afraid of that this is, you know, the devil that they should not be touching. With a stick. It's, it's an it's a technology. And ideally, and I think that's something that we as web three need to need to nail much better than we currently do. Ideally, we understand that all of this is running under the hood. And we need to portray it in a way and we need to also enable us in a way that it looks like you don't even know that it's it's all of this is running on blockchain. You don't have to care you can operate as you operate it always we know we've just at a lower cost level on a higher frequency and at a at an easier auditability. So your auditor will be very happy with that. But you as an investor in a climate mitigation project, you might not even have to care and you should not care and I think that is where we need to go. And there's many many cool projects that that that triad is and building on ramps and off ramps and automation, etc. So so that people don't even have to interact with anything that feels like we have three or four is complicated or setting up Metamask wallets and stuff like that. And, but we're still early, we're still, you know, on the going west strip currently. So we're, we're the early pioneers, and we're learning every day on how to make it, you know, more acceptable for the, for the broader masses. And we also need a little bit of, you know, reaching out your hand from the broader masses, or for the representative of that, which is regulators maybe. And in all of that, that handshake will inevitably happen. And we all will prosper from that a lot. But I think it will be happening quicker, the less, you know, prejudice we have in between them, the less fat that is in between. So any kind of educational material, such as this is super highly welcome. And I think it's super important. And in the adoption Yeah,

10:59
that's one thing that drew said that that's that's important as well drew from Panama, from clay McDowell, you know, he said, he they're working with a number of organizations on to build the tooling to so they don't and they don't even know this blockchain. Right. So also, another thing is, they're actually doing a lot of education, what they had within industry, so are you do you all find a you all are doing the education? Or is it mostly the community that's educating people on what to can does, how's that working within your ecosystem?

11:29
It's both it's it's people who have the who hold the customer relationships because we don't sell credits or produce them or ideally interact with them on the, you know, outskirts of the on the extreme points of the lifecycle. But there's, you know, marketplaces and intermediaries, and, you know, consultants for project developers or project developers themselves, who educate other product developers. So we, we, we rely on those, of course, and it's the only scalable way of doing that. But at the same time, we do know that we have an educational you know, a, a task a quest of doing that. And so we do that we create lots of content, on on different aspects, we try to join every working groups on the, you know, from the conventional market, in order to, to educate players that are sitting at these extreme points, for example, standard bodies. So we spend a lot of energy and a lot of time for example, on on formulating what we think, is important input for the consultation pieces. So last summer, we'll be going down in my history, my memory as the as the consultation summer, because practically every every standard body issued their own consultations with overlapping, but also specific questions to their situation. And we try to answer all of them, and we try to be as collaborative as possible, and, you know, work and extend the hands. And even, you know, bend a little bit from away from our way we want to do in ways that are more easily to understand or easy to grasp. For, for, for the incumbent players. So in order to make this more, you know, to create a pathway, how information can flow, because the thing, one of the worst thing that anyone and everyone in this space can do on either side. And I even hate the idea of their sides about this. But if you think about web two, and web three, the worst thing we can do is being elitist. And that is either being like, Hey, we've always done it like that. And we're the fuck are you guys. And on the same way, the other way around, like, Hey, we're free, like we are. The old ways are all dumb, and all corrupt. And it's all run by banks, and it's not working. None of this is helpful. So I think the best thing we can all do, as doing what we all do best. So if you're good at content, you create content we have bunch of people also internally have to look into can do we do that and we create a lot of dots of those contents, we collaborate and I would ask the community and I always do too, you know, to do their missionary purpose on this as well. And I think it's we're making we're making headway with this. It's it's being from a standpoint where we have a standoff really between players. We're getting much closer with with everyone in what both the demand and supply side with with intermediaries and with standard improv And, and with lobby groups and interest groups, etc. All of them are, you know, trying to understand each other better, and all of them are trying to educate each other. So, that's really good. Excellent,

15:14
excellent. So, whenever So, given that, you know, the what your particular model, what, what, what protocols are you currently own? And then in your, in your opinion, how important is the interoperability between different different protocols and different ecosystems for this type of solution? Yeah, I'm trying to see how this how this Meterpreter registry works, from a interoperability perspective? Like, is that like a roll up? Like,

15:45
how's that work? So, question number one, what's the network's currently on so we are on Polygon, and cielo and are looking out for other for other chains as well. So we believe that the protocol should be on all chains, or basically on all chains that are interested or, and also interesting, in sense of an ecosystem that can benefit from the so there's no point in being on chains, and it's no point for chains that they have, you know, a utility, like a carbon crediting, or a carbon credit registry and bridges to carbon crediting systems, if there is no, no one using that. So one, one of the things that is important to us is that there's a, an ecosystem, a thriving ecosystem of demand and, and where this can, where these kinds of assets can create utility for people being it's for, you know, financial primitives, and the what's called refi use cases. But it's also in a sense, where, where people, for example, have exposition, and, and are very well on the way in this, you know, building a bridge to the, to the and I know that I'm stressing this metaphor a lot today, we're basically building a bridge to, to the web toots, fear of things and where corporates, for example, feel at home. I think this is also a very valuable, very valuable place to be. And so what do we think about interoperability, we think it's key for this, because we also don't think that there's one ecosystem to rule them all. Much, like, there's not one standard ng program to rule them all. Much. Like, there's not one methodology to rule them all. Much. Like there's not, you know, carbon removal, take care of everything. It's, it's a, you know, portfolio of solutions, like we have a portfolio of programs we're trying to solve here. So we need to have a portfolio of solutions. And for that interoperability is one piece. And so because it's unlocking, because different ecosystems, basically is the hypothesis here. And so how does it work as a matter as history, a meta registry needs to function meta, so aggregating in a form for different input factors, like standard programs, but it also needs to be meta in a form of it needs to be valid on on on different chains and different ecosystems. And the whole idea of, if you remember, in the beginning, I said stuff about not, you know, double use credits or not double count things, this has this has to be true, and has to be proliferated into this, you know, task of creating interoperability, because it would be, it would be a horrible scenario, if you go from one chain to another chain, and you basically you double the carbon credit, or you spend the carbon credit and you don't track it in this, you enable double spend. So that is one very, very crucial aspect that needs to be taken care of, and that is taken care of every time that we go to another chain. That we that we make sure that value can flow between systems, but can say we'll stay unique. And there's only basically one carbon credit or what in a token, reflecting one tonne sequestered from, from the atmosphere at any given time. And not several ones.

19:43
Excellent. So, so you mentioned you mentioned the whole refund thing. I think we've mentioned that a few times already. So in your definition, is it is it is it refi or is it is it common finance, you know, because the

20:00
In your words, I think refi to me is conceptually baking climate finance into finance. So by baking, climate mitigation, and and enabling the regeneration of the planet, by baking it as a financial as financial primitives into how we do business, how we transact value today. And so ideally, the outcome, the ultimate outcome of, of refi is that every time you transact one currency of value, you heal the planet a little bit. And now there's a bunch of things you could do that and carbon markets play a core role in this because they are the most advanced most, the biggest tool that we came up as a, as humans today. While that was employing the power of markets, into climate finance, and not make it a philanthropic thing, or a, we rely on governments only thing, because we saw that this is going nowhere fast enough. And that it's just taking too much time and politics are getting in the way of survival here. So we could there was created a private system and the concept mechanistic the concept of refi is to take the system and fill it with what we do anyway by transacting money by wanting to make profit by wanting to grow by creating utility by creating financial freedom, for example. And what better way would there be banking the unbanked creating financial freedom for the rest of the world? For people who don't have it yet, and at the same time, hook everyone up to this other system? That is basically empowering regeneration? So yeah, it is climate finance. But it's a thing, it's, it's powering climate finance. By again, it's it's the theme is recurring, putting it under the hood, ideally, you don't know what that you don't know that you participate in a refi. You don't, you know, think about that, you come and you want to borrow money, great, go to this place where you can, you know, borrow against, you know, you can hold a carbon asset, for example, and borrow against that, why why not that, rather than holding cash, why not finance, climate mitigation first, basically, and holding an appreciating asset, and borrow against that. So this is, you know, an example of how you bake finance, how you take climate finance and put it into financial primitives that we all use and need to use and want to use every day.

22:50
So, so given these, because I'm on board with you, I love what you all are doing. But you know, based on what you say, based on the conversations that you have in the industry, how far how far, how far out? Are we into into mass adoption for this? You know, in your in your in your opinion?

23:12
I think we're, we're not we're not as far away comparatively as the blockchain space itself. So it's a little bit of a conundrum. So it's younger than then web three in total is younger than decentralized finance. But it's less dependent on on recreating financial flow and, you know, on banking banks, for example, or on stuff like that, we are much closer and it's much easier for us to adopt because we are we are replacing a system that needed to be or needs to be wants to be also replaced and people are not fine, like many parts of the market are not fighting back against this and fighting back against technology, the blockchain technology and see the tremendous value that especially around transparency and immutability, and you know, no human error can take place in this what needs to be a high scale always available and high security ledger system. There's the role of trust into that already from from market sides. So, the adoption part that we need to have and the mass adoption part I think is is something that is via what you also discussed before and withdrew from from from key model and what I mentioned earlier also via the the idea of, you know, putting all of this under the hood and having having a usability layer on top of that, that To take care of fears and complexity, and etc, I think it's easier for us to do that in the climate space and in the climate finance space, than to do that, for example, in mass financing products. And, you know, replacing banks for your everyday is persons saving a checking account, or how you want to get your salary being paid in crypto or whatever, some stuff like this, I think this is much more complex and complicated and has many more barriers than where we are currently operating. Which is why all of this is and it's often called the killer use case, which is a bit you know, maybe poor wording, but it's it's a fantastic use case for blockchain. Because the value is intrinsic, it's we don't have to come up with currencies, and tell you that you need to trust me that there's definitely value in my protocol, you can see it, it's, it's there, you understand it, because people pay for the asset already. And at the same time, there is a little bit of educational effort to be done. But I think there can be a huge analog, for example, when major players in the industry, for example, standard bodies started officially endorsing this or when major when major demand side players unlock, you know, unlock the gates by buying into this. And trusting this, I think that will have a ripple effect. And that that will be tremendous. And it will be easier, because the market itself currently, it's a $2 billion market VCM. So it's very easy to like, comparatively easy to bring that on chain, for example. And requires not that much capital as other markets would, for example, require, if you want to bring the whole real estate space onto blockchains, that will be a much bigger endeavor. So I think we are at a point where many interesting things come together, market is still small, sadly, but that's the truth. DCM is still too small, we need to grow it. But we are in a place where this means we can we can we have people and we have counterparts that are very, that are centralized enough to talk to them in a custom fashion and can convey the story uniquely so that people can understand it. And so that we can take fears, as everyone has them. And we can address them individually. So we don't have to run around with for, you know, with, with 1000s of companies on an odd 1000s of standard bodies of 1000s of of centers or hundreds of regional governments or something like this, there's only a few for us, comparatively, to condense. And so I think that plus the intrinsic value of, of web three for this is, is an awesome singularity that we should capitalize on. And I think one of the big barriers that's still in between all of that is, like I said, the missing educational piece or the and, you know, in conjunction with that the fear around what could go wrong. But yeah, I think that's something to me, it seems like this is this is a problem that's that can be tackled.

28:50
Yeah. And you say you say something, you said something that I hadn't even thought of yet. Where with this, you're actually solving a true a true real life problem. Where in the past, in a lot of use cases in blockchain, we were creating solutions, yes, the solutions work. But we really weren't solving the problem. Right? So if we can educate if we can educate the people that yes, we are solving a real world problem, that nothing that you know, that's one thing that that's one way that we can get people in and also was very interesting, where you where you point out that it's going to be easy to bring a whole entire, you know, sector on chain. Right. You know, I think I think it'd be impossible to bring a real estate industry on chain in my opinion, but but like you said, it's so centralized and so small, that you can bring it on chain, that's another that's another interesting interesting concept that you can bring to the industry to the to the standard or that standard or standard and standardized bodies, where you know, I think you're gonna get you're gonna get this web to adoption within within this space. So so that's that's pretty much all I had. We went we went a little long so so I apologize for that. But how can how can people find you? And do you have any any calls to action for people who view

30:05
this? Absolutely. So you can find us on to planet earth, you find all of our socials there and information, I think we're still on every social channel that that you most likely want to be on also. And you will find this there also as token protocol, join our Discord. We do have a very nice Desportes comm conversation going on. And you can ask any questions there reach out to us on any of the socials. And you can you can it leads to getting interviews the next day, if you if you do that. So we're all there to answer any questions. And my call to action. Is that get familiar with all of this, like, if you are if you are a web to person working in the space interested in that, read up on this ask questions where like the whole community is super, like it's a it's a game changer if you change from a web to, you know, ecosystem into a web three ecosystem. And you see how helpful people are how there's no dumb questions, how anything and everything you want to ask can be asked and will be answered sometimes with memes, but in 90% of the times you will you will get a proper answer and go about this. There's no fear. You don't have to have any fear about this. And reach out and my call to action to any web feed crowd watching or, or that that has been that, you know, is being involved in this is we don't want to be any kind of interest like we we need some. We need some humble that has been a market that has been pulled for decades. And it's working no matter what we think about it. It's working. It's creating mitigation action. And I think we all of us, the whole purpose is to not increase the divide, but actually take it away. And for that, I think we need to respect and meet people where where they are mentally and help them make the transition to what we all know already is generational technology. It's our internet basically our intimate moment. And there is no you know, nothing to be ashamed of, but also nothing to be elitist or proud of in a sense that this is all for us all together. Andy, thank

32:56
you thank you for your time. Thank you for your time. I really appreciate it. And you gave us you gave you gave you gave me a lot to a lot to further free research further. And best of luck to you and to Ken. Thank you very much. All right, thanks. See everyone

VeChain Foundation Climate Research - Justin Goldston Interviews Andi Stanner of Toucan Protocol
Video link - https://youtu.be/bERCJtmv_AA

Hey, everyone, this is Andy from from Touken protocol as you introduce me, I'm product leader to come protocol. So I'm looking into and after everything in anything around metal registries. So basically the way of tracking carbon across its lifecycle and also around all the product aspects that we have to bring harm on chain, which is what we call bridges. That's basically tokenizing assets, namely carbon credits at this point in time, and bringing it into the metal registry. And then later handing it over to our other departments that are looking into giving carbon credits more utility on chain, which is financial products, commodification, and, you know, utility beyond the retirement of carbon, because that is our hypothesis that with more of these utility aspects around carbon tokens, which is unique to the blockchain and web three, and what web three can do with carbon. Our hypothesis is that this is basically what's you know, what will be driving a huge wave of demands and what will become a a sink for carbon credits, which ultimately, obviously creates demand for new projects and new mitigation action. And this is all what do we want to do?

01:51
Excellent, thanks. Thanks for that. So so, you know, in my, in my initial research within within this space, you know, going back a while back, you know, this whole meta registry, you know, topic came up, can you can you define that for non natives? I think that would be that would be good.

02:09
Yeah. So today, what we have is we have a bunch of registries and standard programs, normally, it goes like this, and we standard program. So, basically a group of, well, scientists or experts will define what is a good carbon crediting project, and who also do the QA, or basically the find the guardrails for the QA into this, they also run a registry system, a ledger of, of carbon credits. So basically, when they be when are they being issued? Who are they being issued to? Who are they being transferred to? And who are they being retired by, and what kind of additional metadata and information all of these transactions happen. So one of the things that we have, obviously, from from this aspect is that we, when we do all of this in silos, and when we're trying to do tackle a global project, and the global problem, we have many, many projects, we have, we get really quickly into interoperability issues and into things like double counting, meaning like you count the same emission reduction or emission, if you will, you count it twice. Or you spend it twice, which will be double use. Because you have systems that don't talk to each other, for example, you have the same projects and two systems. Or you move one project to from one system to another, and you lose a lot of data in between. So this is a big issue on a inter governmental level. But this is also a big issue on the private sector level, which is the voluntary carbon market. Because none of these crediting standards are, you know, have an oversight overseeing body that is regulating all of that. We do that in the VCM. So the voluntary carbon market, you know, in a self regulatory, and pseudo regulatory way, and yet we still our systems are still not connected to each other. So we have a lot of friction there. We lose transparency along the way. It's very costly to then retro actively establish transparency. So looking in doing due diligence doing audits on where something from or is this the only registry that has this project, for example, can I safely spend the credits kind of rest assured for that? So we spend a lot of money and time on that. So an ideal scenario is of course, a, a tooling that would combine all of these and build prisons between these these silos. And what better infrastructure has there ever been than a system that can be run completely trustless and doesn't require any private entity, any administrator any anyone who could do human error or could go rogue or could go out of business and lose all records, what better system did we ever have then at this point in time, where we have public blockchains who or which can take all of this information and are practically built for this because every transaction has embedded value into it. So and that is exactly what transacting carbon credits is you transact value. And so these systems are made for it. And our purpose, as a matter of history is that we provide a way of having a a ledger system that is can can serve can serve all these purposes that normally a centralized entity would do, which will to be combined all of this we keep track of one at one place, basically, conceptually in one place. But with all the benefits of a decentralized system, which is we we go out of business doesn't matter, right. So we have no way of spending or erasing, erasing the history of a credit or spending and credit credit twice or help anyone, no matter how many trillions of dollars you put onto this ledger, we cannot, it's it's the safest it can get at this point. And that is why we believe, and increasingly many thankfully due so that we need a registry of registries basically. So a meta registry, where current assets can be tracked can be can live, basically, through all of their lifecycle. Excellent.

07:08
So So with this, so yeah, you mentioned you mentioned they, you mentioned a number of a few challenges, you know, outside of the challenges that you already mentioned, what other challenges do you see with with this with this type of of comment, finance adoption, within this space, you know, from the from the current web through space, and then in order to get these traditional web two companies to come over to web three, and try and try to utilize this this tool.

07:39
I think one of the main, the main friction points here is the, you know, guilt by affiliation. In a sense that there's a lot of prejudice against what web three is, and what's happening inside of web three, and there's a lot of focus on on like, a very minor fraction of, of the actual energy that's been put into this in a sense of that is that that is actual scams, or that is actually a net negative for, for the planet. And it's being portrayed onto, onto a system that is trying to solve something completely different with what is a perfectly neutral infrastructure and perfectly neutral technology. And I think there's a lot of, you know, educational effort to be made, and also regulatory clarity to be given. So that people are, and by people, I mean, companies mostly, are not afraid of that this is, you know, the devil that they should not be touching. With a stick. It's, it's an it's a technology. And ideally, and I think that's something that we as web three need to need to nail much better than we currently do. Ideally, we understand that all of this is running under the hood. And we need to portray it in a way and we need to also enable us in a way that it looks like you don't even know that it's it's all of this is running on blockchain. You don't have to care you can operate as you operate it always we know we've just at a lower cost level on a higher frequency and at a at an easier auditability. So your auditor will be very happy with that. But you as an investor in a climate mitigation project, you might not even have to care and you should not care and I think that is where we need to go. And there's many many cool projects that that that triad is and building on ramps and off ramps and automation, etc. So so that people don't even have to interact with anything that feels like we have three or four is complicated or setting up Metamask wallets and stuff like that. And, but we're still early, we're still, you know, on the going west strip currently. So we're, we're the early pioneers, and we're learning every day on how to make it, you know, more acceptable for the, for the broader masses. And we also need a little bit of, you know, reaching out your hand from the broader masses, or for the representative of that, which is regulators maybe. And in all of that, that handshake will inevitably happen. And we all will prosper from that a lot. But I think it will be happening quicker, the less, you know, prejudice we have in between them, the less fat that is in between. So any kind of educational material, such as this is super highly welcome. And I think it's super important. And in the adoption Yeah,

10:59
that's one thing that drew said that that's that's important as well drew from Panama, from clay McDowell, you know, he said, he they're working with a number of organizations on to build the tooling to so they don't and they don't even know this blockchain. Right. So also, another thing is, they're actually doing a lot of education, what they had within industry, so are you do you all find a you all are doing the education? Or is it mostly the community that's educating people on what to can does, how's that working within your ecosystem?

11:29
It's both it's it's people who have the who hold the customer relationships because we don't sell credits or produce them or ideally interact with them on the, you know, outskirts of the on the extreme points of the lifecycle. But there's, you know, marketplaces and intermediaries, and, you know, consultants for project developers or project developers themselves, who educate other product developers. So we, we, we rely on those, of course, and it's the only scalable way of doing that. But at the same time, we do know that we have an educational you know, a, a task a quest of doing that. And so we do that we create lots of content, on on different aspects, we try to join every working groups on the, you know, from the conventional market, in order to, to educate players that are sitting at these extreme points, for example, standard bodies. So we spend a lot of energy and a lot of time for example, on on formulating what we think, is important input for the consultation pieces. So last summer, we'll be going down in my history, my memory as the as the consultation summer, because practically every every standard body issued their own consultations with overlapping, but also specific questions to their situation. And we try to answer all of them, and we try to be as collaborative as possible, and, you know, work and extend the hands. And even, you know, bend a little bit from away from our way we want to do in ways that are more easily to understand or easy to grasp. For, for, for the incumbent players. So in order to make this more, you know, to create a pathway, how information can flow, because the thing, one of the worst thing that anyone and everyone in this space can do on either side. And I even hate the idea of their sides about this. But if you think about web two, and web three, the worst thing we can do is being elitist. And that is either being like, Hey, we've always done it like that. And we're the fuck are you guys. And on the same way, the other way around, like, Hey, we're free, like we are. The old ways are all dumb, and all corrupt. And it's all run by banks, and it's not working. None of this is helpful. So I think the best thing we can all do, as doing what we all do best. So if you're good at content, you create content we have bunch of people also internally have to look into can do we do that and we create a lot of dots of those contents, we collaborate and I would ask the community and I always do too, you know, to do their missionary purpose on this as well. And I think it's we're making we're making headway with this. It's it's being from a standpoint where we have a standoff really between players. We're getting much closer with with everyone in what both the demand and supply side with with intermediaries and with standard improv And, and with lobby groups and interest groups, etc. All of them are, you know, trying to understand each other better, and all of them are trying to educate each other. So, that's really good. Excellent,

15:14
excellent. So, whenever So, given that, you know, the what your particular model, what, what, what protocols are you currently own? And then in your, in your opinion, how important is the interoperability between different different protocols and different ecosystems for this type of solution? Yeah, I'm trying to see how this how this Meterpreter registry works, from a interoperability perspective? Like, is that like a roll up? Like,

15:45
how's that work? So, question number one, what's the network's currently on so we are on Polygon, and cielo and are looking out for other for other chains as well. So we believe that the protocol should be on all chains, or basically on all chains that are interested or, and also interesting, in sense of an ecosystem that can benefit from the so there's no point in being on chains, and it's no point for chains that they have, you know, a utility, like a carbon crediting, or a carbon credit registry and bridges to carbon crediting systems, if there is no, no one using that. So one, one of the things that is important to us is that there's a, an ecosystem, a thriving ecosystem of demand and, and where this can, where these kinds of assets can create utility for people being it's for, you know, financial primitives, and the what's called refi use cases. But it's also in a sense, where, where people, for example, have exposition, and, and are very well on the way in this, you know, building a bridge to the, to the and I know that I'm stressing this metaphor a lot today, we're basically building a bridge to, to the web toots, fear of things and where corporates, for example, feel at home. I think this is also a very valuable, very valuable place to be. And so what do we think about interoperability, we think it's key for this, because we also don't think that there's one ecosystem to rule them all. Much, like, there's not one standard ng program to rule them all. Much. Like, there's not one methodology to rule them all. Much. Like there's not, you know, carbon removal, take care of everything. It's, it's a, you know, portfolio of solutions, like we have a portfolio of programs we're trying to solve here. So we need to have a portfolio of solutions. And for that interoperability is one piece. And so because it's unlocking, because different ecosystems, basically is the hypothesis here. And so how does it work as a matter as history, a meta registry needs to function meta, so aggregating in a form for different input factors, like standard programs, but it also needs to be meta in a form of it needs to be valid on on on different chains and different ecosystems. And the whole idea of, if you remember, in the beginning, I said stuff about not, you know, double use credits or not double count things, this has this has to be true, and has to be proliferated into this, you know, task of creating interoperability, because it would be, it would be a horrible scenario, if you go from one chain to another chain, and you basically you double the carbon credit, or you spend the carbon credit and you don't track it in this, you enable double spend. So that is one very, very crucial aspect that needs to be taken care of, and that is taken care of every time that we go to another chain. That we that we make sure that value can flow between systems, but can say we'll stay unique. And there's only basically one carbon credit or what in a token, reflecting one tonne sequestered from, from the atmosphere at any given time. And not several ones.

19:43
Excellent. So, so you mentioned you mentioned the whole refund thing. I think we've mentioned that a few times already. So in your definition, is it is it is it refi or is it is it common finance, you know, because the

20:00
In your words, I think refi to me is conceptually baking climate finance into finance. So by baking, climate mitigation, and and enabling the regeneration of the planet, by baking it as a financial as financial primitives into how we do business, how we transact value today. And so ideally, the outcome, the ultimate outcome of, of refi is that every time you transact one currency of value, you heal the planet a little bit. And now there's a bunch of things you could do that and carbon markets play a core role in this because they are the most advanced most, the biggest tool that we came up as a, as humans today. While that was employing the power of markets, into climate finance, and not make it a philanthropic thing, or a, we rely on governments only thing, because we saw that this is going nowhere fast enough. And that it's just taking too much time and politics are getting in the way of survival here. So we could there was created a private system and the concept mechanistic the concept of refi is to take the system and fill it with what we do anyway by transacting money by wanting to make profit by wanting to grow by creating utility by creating financial freedom, for example. And what better way would there be banking the unbanked creating financial freedom for the rest of the world? For people who don't have it yet, and at the same time, hook everyone up to this other system? That is basically empowering regeneration? So yeah, it is climate finance. But it's a thing, it's, it's powering climate finance. By again, it's it's the theme is recurring, putting it under the hood, ideally, you don't know what that you don't know that you participate in a refi. You don't, you know, think about that, you come and you want to borrow money, great, go to this place where you can, you know, borrow against, you know, you can hold a carbon asset, for example, and borrow against that, why why not that, rather than holding cash, why not finance, climate mitigation first, basically, and holding an appreciating asset, and borrow against that. So this is, you know, an example of how you bake finance, how you take climate finance and put it into financial primitives that we all use and need to use and want to use every day.

22:50
So, so given these, because I'm on board with you, I love what you all are doing. But you know, based on what you say, based on the conversations that you have in the industry, how far how far, how far out? Are we into into mass adoption for this? You know, in your in your in your opinion?

23:12
I think we're, we're not we're not as far away comparatively as the blockchain space itself. So it's a little bit of a conundrum. So it's younger than then web three in total is younger than decentralized finance. But it's less dependent on on recreating financial flow and, you know, on banking banks, for example, or on stuff like that, we are much closer and it's much easier for us to adopt because we are we are replacing a system that needed to be or needs to be wants to be also replaced and people are not fine, like many parts of the market are not fighting back against this and fighting back against technology, the blockchain technology and see the tremendous value that especially around transparency and immutability, and you know, no human error can take place in this what needs to be a high scale always available and high security ledger system. There's the role of trust into that already from from market sides. So, the adoption part that we need to have and the mass adoption part I think is is something that is via what you also discussed before and withdrew from from from key model and what I mentioned earlier also via the the idea of, you know, putting all of this under the hood and having having a usability layer on top of that, that To take care of fears and complexity, and etc, I think it's easier for us to do that in the climate space and in the climate finance space, than to do that, for example, in mass financing products. And, you know, replacing banks for your everyday is persons saving a checking account, or how you want to get your salary being paid in crypto or whatever, some stuff like this, I think this is much more complex and complicated and has many more barriers than where we are currently operating. Which is why all of this is and it's often called the killer use case, which is a bit you know, maybe poor wording, but it's it's a fantastic use case for blockchain. Because the value is intrinsic, it's we don't have to come up with currencies, and tell you that you need to trust me that there's definitely value in my protocol, you can see it, it's, it's there, you understand it, because people pay for the asset already. And at the same time, there is a little bit of educational effort to be done. But I think there can be a huge analog, for example, when major players in the industry, for example, standard bodies started officially endorsing this or when major when major demand side players unlock, you know, unlock the gates by buying into this. And trusting this, I think that will have a ripple effect. And that that will be tremendous. And it will be easier, because the market itself currently, it's a $2 billion market VCM. So it's very easy to like, comparatively easy to bring that on chain, for example. And requires not that much capital as other markets would, for example, require, if you want to bring the whole real estate space onto blockchains, that will be a much bigger endeavor. So I think we are at a point where many interesting things come together, market is still small, sadly, but that's the truth. DCM is still too small, we need to grow it. But we are in a place where this means we can we can we have people and we have counterparts that are very, that are centralized enough to talk to them in a custom fashion and can convey the story uniquely so that people can understand it. And so that we can take fears, as everyone has them. And we can address them individually. So we don't have to run around with for, you know, with, with 1000s of companies on an odd 1000s of standard bodies of 1000s of of centers or hundreds of regional governments or something like this, there's only a few for us, comparatively, to condense. And so I think that plus the intrinsic value of, of web three for this is, is an awesome singularity that we should capitalize on. And I think one of the big barriers that's still in between all of that is, like I said, the missing educational piece or the and, you know, in conjunction with that the fear around what could go wrong. But yeah, I think that's something to me, it seems like this is this is a problem that's that can be tackled.

28:50
Yeah. And you say you say something, you said something that I hadn't even thought of yet. Where with this, you're actually solving a true a true real life problem. Where in the past, in a lot of use cases in blockchain, we were creating solutions, yes, the solutions work. But we really weren't solving the problem. Right? So if we can educate if we can educate the people that yes, we are solving a real world problem, that nothing that you know, that's one thing that that's one way that we can get people in and also was very interesting, where you where you point out that it's going to be easy to bring a whole entire, you know, sector on chain. Right. You know, I think I think it'd be impossible to bring a real estate industry on chain in my opinion, but but like you said, it's so centralized and so small, that you can bring it on chain, that's another that's another interesting interesting concept that you can bring to the industry to the to the standard or that standard or standard and standardized bodies, where you know, I think you're gonna get you're gonna get this web to adoption within within this space. So so that's that's pretty much all I had. We went we went a little long so so I apologize for that. But how can how can people find you? And do you have any any calls to action for people who view

30:05
this? Absolutely. So you can find us on to planet earth, you find all of our socials there and information, I think we're still on every social channel that that you most likely want to be on also. And you will find this there also as token protocol, join our Discord. We do have a very nice Desportes comm conversation going on. And you can ask any questions there reach out to us on any of the socials. And you can you can it leads to getting interviews the next day, if you if you do that. So we're all there to answer any questions. And my call to action. Is that get familiar with all of this, like, if you are if you are a web to person working in the space interested in that, read up on this ask questions where like the whole community is super, like it's a it's a game changer if you change from a web to, you know, ecosystem into a web three ecosystem. And you see how helpful people are how there's no dumb questions, how anything and everything you want to ask can be asked and will be answered sometimes with memes, but in 90% of the times you will you will get a proper answer and go about this. There's no fear. You don't have to have any fear about this. And reach out and my call to action to any web feed crowd watching or, or that that has been that, you know, is being involved in this is we don't want to be any kind of interest like we we need some. We need some humble that has been a market that has been pulled for decades. And it's working no matter what we think about it. It's working. It's creating mitigation action. And I think we all of us, the whole purpose is to not increase the divide, but actually take it away. And for that, I think we need to respect and meet people where where they are mentally and help them make the transition to what we all know already is generational technology. It's our internet basically our intimate moment. And there is no you know, nothing to be ashamed of, but also nothing to be elitist or proud of in a sense that this is all for us all together. Andy, thank

32:56
you thank you for your time. Thank you for your time. I really appreciate it. And you gave us you gave you gave you gave me a lot to a lot to further free research further. And best of luck to you and to Ken. Thank you very much. All right, thanks. See everyone

VeChain Foundation Climate Research with Justin Goldston and Alison Filler of Climate Collective
Video Link - https://youtu.be/sYGk1KpS9cQ

Hey, everyone, my name is Alison. Thanks, Justin. I'm with climate Collective, we are an innovation network that is supporting entrepreneurs, scientists, nonprofits, investors, to build out and apply new digital technologies to unlock climate action at scale. So glad to be with you today.

00:38
Yes, thank you for that. So, so I've been I've been speaking with a number of people on this on this topic. I've been having some various opinions on on tracking on tracking carbon emissions, carbon emissions and carbon credits on the blockchain, you know, what's your, what's your thoughts on that? And, you know, what do you think the future holds on that topic?

01:04
Yeah, well, I think we have a lot of opportunities. Right now, we don't have too many proven use cases yet. But we have a lot of opportunity to explore. And some of the benefits that we're looking forward to with tracking carbon on chain are primarily in terms of transparency and auditability. So to understand why this is useful at all, we have to go back to what are the problems that we're trying to solve, and tracking carbon off chain or just anywhere in the real world, we can look at carbon markets, those have been where most of the activity around measuring and tracking carbon over time have occurred. So over the last 20 years with the voluntary carbon market, a lot of the procedures for measuring reporting and verifying carbon sequestration has been largely analog. So it's been literally paper and pencil or just an Excel spreadsheet. And sometimes it's it's uploaded into a PDF. But that's not even machine readable. So there are a lot of opportunities to automate those processes and increase the efficiency, and also the transparency of how this is done. And, of course, science evolves over time different methodologies for measuring how carbon is being sequestered or removed. So it makes sense that we'll have to update the science over time and then update how we measure as well. So I think that's something that tracking on chain can help us with in terms of transparency over time, how the science has changed, to help us have a bit more honest intellectual honesty, about how we're conducting this work. And with auditability, being able to look back in time on an immutable ledger. So tracking something on blockchain allows you it's tamper proof, right? You can't change it once it's stored. So you can have a lot higher confidence in the data itself. And building endpoints of automation, with with smart contracts or with just automated calculation even can help remove some of those risks for human error in the process. So at a broad view, I think those are a lot of the opportunities to say nothing of the financial opportunity of what decentralized finance might allow for us as well.

03:16
Yeah, you mentioned a few things there, I want to go I want to circle back on that decentralized finance aspect later. But ever, you said that a number of that a lot of this content, a lot of this information is is you know, tracked on on pen on pen and paper or pencil and paper, right, depending on where it is. Do you first see do you foresee with the advancements in AI, the use for see aI have an impact on this on Tron? Have an AI read read some of that some of that older information and kind of transfer that information on chain? And if so, like, how do you envision that? I just now thought of that. So, man I've been beefing?

03:59
It's an interesting question. I I'm, I am not super well versed in AI. So I'm, I'm I wonder if different AI or machine learning models could help us to sift through that legacy data that is collected, I wonder if it could help us come up with different trends or just help us to process that that wealth of data that does exist if it was in a machine readable format, first of all, so if it was all digital, perhaps different AI tools could help with that. But that's part of the problem, too. A lot of this data is stored in very different formats. It's not. It's it's not all readable in in a unified way. So I think that's probably part of step one. That's as much as I can say at this point, though.

04:50
Yeah. Yeah. So So given that given that it's in different formats. Do you have any kind of insight on how you You can how we can kind of standardize can standardize information where we can have not really like, well, I can't say a centralized platform because we're not trying to move into centralization, but have like a common language or or a type of a standard for for all of this all of this tracking. Does that make sense?

05:22
Yeah, I think you could compile data, potentially in a central repository, but collected through decentralized methods. So I think you could create something like a single source of truth, where data is pulled from many different servers, many different file types, and converted into a more open source database. So if you were to have kind of like a central library of climate data that's publicly accessible, it's a digital public good that everyone could tap into. And access for high quality climate data, could that then help standardize kind of how, how climate work is conducted if we were all operating off of the same song sheet?

06:11
Okay, so So I know you mentioned, I know, you mentioned decentralized finance. And I want to kind of kind of go into that space a little bit, delve into that a little bit, you know, how do you think So in your opinion, because I've received different different statements on there? So are you saying that, that, you know, this sustainability movement, this this carbon carbon tracking movement, is going to be in a default space? Or do you think is going to create like a new, a new, a new bucket, for lack of a bad term of this refi that that, that people are referring to it as

06:55
I think, I think there will be a number of different applications, I think, where decentralized finance tools come in, are, they can help us tap into new areas of liquidity. So again, if you're talking about tracking carbon, for the purposes of incentivizing different behaviors, let's say you're you're using credit, carbon credits as a medium, or as some kind of token of exchange, to incentivize a certain behavior. And you want to reward or punish certain behaviors, you know, we could also think about a carbon tax. But let's stick with maybe the credit analogy here. If you are, you know, there are a couple of reasons why you might invest in a carbon credit, you could purchase it, invest in it, for the purposes of retiring it, and claiming the environmental benefit, right. And maybe I'm, maybe I'm a large corporation, or I'm a, an industry partner, and I have a carbon balance that I need to account for or want to account for. And I'm going to claim that environmental benefit by investing in carbon credits. Or you could use it as a financial instrument, you know, you could, you could see it as a digital environmental asset, a new asset class, that if I hold, I think this is going to be more valuable in the future, maybe I want to resell it. Now, there are various pros and cons to that approach. But one thing that it can help us with as a financial instrument is to channel more capital into carbon projects. So if we, if we look at the tools of defi, and different liquidity pools that exist on blockchain, that really could be a method. If we if we track credits on chain, it could help be a method of channeling new streams of finance, new streams of capital, into, you know, the important carbon sequestration projects that we need to be scaling up across the world. And that's how you transfer the capital into real world climate action.

08:58
Excellent. Okay. So, so based on so I understand that you all worked with a number of different different groups. And, you know, based on your experience, what, what, what current challenges the you all face? Or what challenges or kind of drawbacks, do you see with with enterprise adoption, you know, individual adoption, as well as enterprise adoption? That's like, probably four questions there. But,

09:30
yeah, for enterprise adoption, I think. And I think this applies to larger institutions as well and some corporate partners. I think there's, you know, this is still a very new space. So just a level of awareness. The, you know, thankfully climate is becoming more more of a focal point in global conversations, in industry, in government, in politics and just in civil affairs. as well. And I think that so a lot of folks are starting to think about, okay, how can I keep track of my carbon footprint? How can I start to measure this? And then how can I do something about it? There's a lot of focus on climate these days. And that's fantastic. But there's not always an understanding of well, how does blockchain come in? What Why does this matter? You know, what are the benefits? Why should I care? Essentially? So I think that the biggest challenge right now is just that basic level of of raising awareness. And and maybe you could call it a communication challenge of sharing, what are the key benefits of blockchain? How can it help provide solutions to the challenges that we face in coordinating mass climate effort across the globe? And then secondary to that, to that awareness and communication is, is building trust. So I think there have been a lot of branding issues, you could say, in the in the web three, you know, in the blockchain space, there's sometimes a, an impression that this is the Wild West, and it can come with a lot of scams, and you know, and that there are a lot of opportunities out there to lose your money or to have no impact and basically to get swindled. So I think this is a real credibility issue. Why would corporates, Why would, why would companies let alone individuals want to get involved in something if they don't have faith in it, if they if they think it's a scam. So I think that's another part of education that is incumbent upon this community to be communicating better, that actually, this enhances, you know, our transparency, and verifiability actually, this, this makes data a lot more accessible. It actually, you know, enables new governance methods. So you open up decision rights to more audiences that may not have had them in the past. So I think communicating how these tools really solve problems will help more audiences to understand what the benefit is, and why this this has such a revolutionary potential in the climate space.

12:15
I liked that. I liked it. And I liked how you I like how you brought up the whenever whenever we struggle with it with the linkages, you know, between between real world use cases and blockchain, you know, because I think that that's one of the current issues, in my opinion, that's one of the current issues that we have now away, as, you know, some of these projects are building solutions, but there's no linkage to a real world use case. Right? So you nail on the head, you hit the nail on the head with that, and then then with the critical credibility, yep, that's a that's a big problem, you know, and so, you did you did kind of touch on some of this, but in your opinion, how do we how do we get, you might be repeating yourself here, but how do we get you know, to you know, while adoption of, of, you know, refi, or, or, you know, building buildings, sustainability, building sustainable use cases, sustainability use cases, right? Only using Blockchain,

13:17
I would take kind of a two pronged approach, I would take kind of a large scale approach. So you target enterprise, you target institutions, you target groups, who have huge business operations. And if they if they implement a new technology, it really offers a step change in, in, in any given industry. And they can also serve as kind of an anchor customer to overcome those credibility issues. Right. So if I'm operating in transportation, and I say, and I see a major trucking company, utilizing blockchain to track its emissions for its supply chain, that changes the changes in the landscape that changes, you know, how it how that company gets to compete in the space, if they have enhanced data, if they have lower costs, if they have particular business advantages from the adoption of this technology, it may trigger others in certain industries to adopt that as well. So think about cloud storage, for example. Any new technology needs a first, a few first movers and early adopters to make something more mainstream and widely adopted. So going with enterprise and going with institutions gives you a lot more visibility and allows you to have a larger impact at a larger scale through through more efficient partnerships that you're investing in essentially. And then I would also take you know, so if you go large scale and you go enterprise and institutional, also be looking at community and individual use, because the applications and the benefits and this comes back to the individual problems that either businesses or institutions or individuals face, they're all going to be different. So if you're designing a solution, you need to design around what is the actual problem that it's solving. And for individuals and communities, I think regenerative finance or you know, Blockchain enabled tools have unique advantages that are different from what you might offer to a business or to an institution. So if businesses and institutions might care a lot about the data integrity, and what it enables in terms of tracking their supply chain, to an individual, what these tools might be able to open up is new revenue streams, new forms of earning income, if I am measuring on the ground, the the evolution of a Carbon Project, maybe I'm reforesting, mangroves, maybe I've been planting mangroves. There are ways that using Blockchain enabled technology to monitor the state of that natural asset, the state of that mangrove forest, could reward me with certain incentives after I upload data. And maybe I can earn revenue for for a project like that this is actually a pilot that a group called gain forest and solid foundation have had been testing out in the Philippines is exactly that. Or perhaps it enables me to access new, new asset classes that I never had before as an individual. Perhaps it allows me to overcome certain fees or unlock greater efficiency with trading resources, as far as it comes to preserving natural community resources. So it all comes down to what is the problem that you want to address? And, and how do you frame the solution, whether that's for a business, or an institution, or to an individual or to a community. And there are really a lot of wide ranging use cases that are being explored, explored in the refi space right now. And that's personally what I find so fascinating.

17:03
I like that. I like that. So it's very, is there anything else that that that you would want to add? In terms of in terms of this discussion, in terms of what more people should? Should? should do? And or do you have like a call to action, you know, in this place?

17:22
Hmm. I would say it's still very early days, right? So a lot of groups are, are still in what I would call like spaghetti on the wall stage, just like throwing and seeing what sticks. There's a lot of innovation happening. It's an incredibly dynamic space. So I would say stay tuned, because there's a lot that's being experimented with and coming out. And we need to do more, right? This is where innovation takes place. And I find that really exciting. But we're also looking for new real world use cases. Because by proving out how something impacts climate work tangibly on the ground, that's where we're going to build the most confidence, I think in in these applications. And that's where we can really help to build trust and help to promote adoption, is by demonstrating to someone how this offers a tangible benefit, either to their business or to their individual life.

18:16
Excellent. So Alison, thank you. Thank you for your time. Where can people where can people find you?

18:24
You can find the climate collective, online at climate collective.org. We're also on LinkedIn and on Twitter.

18:32
All right. Thank you. Once again, thank you for your time and for everyone else. Until next time. Thanks

VeChain Foundation Climate Research with Fran Benedito and Chief Cherry of ClimateTrade
Video link - https://youtu.be/NYO_yk9-8EY

My name is Shannon Sherry, a lot of my friends and colleagues call me Chief for Chief Terry. Justin, so great to see you. Once again. We've got we've got a great history together through TEDx. And through being presenters and the organization. And I thoroughly enjoyed your, your topic on blockchain technology in TEDx Cocoa Beach a few years ago. So I really appreciate you inviting us on this call. I'm actually the director of sales with a emphasis on aviation, at climate trade here in the US. So I'm working with partners, partnerships, and we're just really working on clients in airlines, aviation, airports, you know, that industry and of course, everyone else is, well, that's just my focus. But today, what I really wanted to bring is really the CEO and one of the founders of climate trade, just an amazing person. He's got a great story. And just really one of the biggest reasons why I came on board why I'm here today, and just doing awesome things in this space, right with with with climate with carbon offsets with Blockchain technology. Without, you know, further ado, I want to introduce to Fran, thank you so much.

01:53
Yeah, thank you so much. And thanks, Justin for, for hosting us for having us here is a pleasure and is mature. Sounds like working together. And you have a strong background. And we are very proud to have unionization. So thanks for having us, Justin and to have inflammatory today.

02:13
Yeah, yeah.

02:14
Thanks for Thanks for coming. So Fran, can you can you just get us started and and just talk about what you all are doing within the within the climate space? And how you're actually integrating that with Dan, you know, are leveraging blockchain to integrate that?

02:29
Yeah, sure. Well, basically, clima Trail is a marketplace where since its inception, we try to create the leading marketplace in terms of supply, user experience and bringing to the companies SMEs, not only corporations, but also SMEs. But at the end, also, citizens, individuals that want to do something against climate change the possibility of accessing, in a very clear, transparent way. Some of the biggest players will why and some of the biggest supply of production today we are the marketplace with more breaks in terms of carbon markets, but not also not only chiral carbon credits, but also biodiversity, plastics, energy, other things, that our solutions for climate change that need funding as well. Right. So we thought when we started with the project, and there is a long story behind that, I don't know. It doesn't come to now to the moment but we started with thinking okay, if the natural markets like the capital markets, natural capital markets and climate markets are based basically, OTC or at 90%, LTC today, maybe they are word by brokers. How can we provide some transparency interests earlier of this and we thought on using Blockchain technology, basically, it was a clear use case, on providing real data of the transactions to the end user, the people that was buying because today, you can go to get a flight and offsetting your carbon of the flight, but you don't really know if your money is going to the developer of the pray. They are saying they are wringing your money to or and you don't have full transparency of how much is the cut of the guy that is buying the providing you the offsets or for real if the answers are for real or not. They can say they're for real, but you don't know if they are canceled or not in the register there. So climate trade uses that blockchain technology was like the first company to do it in the world in 2018. We were awarded by the UN by this. And basically we've been evolving through our API to keep constantly innovating in terms of connecting our marketplace to registries bring transaction in kilos not only tones, which is was normally something that and blockchain for us as a climate trade. It is A source of transparency interest already for the user, right, is a tool to provide that.

05:09
Interesting.

05:10
So can you can you? Can you expand on this on this API integration a

05:16
little bit? I know some of its proprietary. But you know, can you get it? Can you give, share some information that you can share? Of course,

05:23
man, Facebook is public. So it's public. So I mean, anyone that wants to enter climate, we can go to market dot climate with.com is for is fully open to the to any any user. And basically, what EPI, it was something that I came up with the idea I was getting a flight to the cop in Bonn, I think it was 2018, I was making a speech there. And I got to Ryan and flight, I pay five euros for my carbon footprint, offsetting. And basically, I didn't receive any certificate, any email, I didn't know where my money was going at all. And I thought, Okay, why five years, which is my carbon footprint, where my money is going. And I said, we have to make that totally the opposite, we have to provide full transparency, because we are also in the age of transparency, right. So bring full transparency to the end user. And that's what we brought. So we certified in blockchain every transaction and that's how the API was incepted was created. So today, we have more than 35 integrations, more use cases than anyone worldwide. And I can put you examples of what we do with the API, we calculate an offset, and user transactions. So whenever you go to buy a product or service in some of the companies we work with, we calculate the the carbon footprint of the product you're buying, then you buy it, you can also the product and then you receive a certificate that accredited where your money is going, which probably you are investing in all that now and put your samples. In Spain, there is a company called Cabify, which is the Uber of can collect the Uber of Spain and Latin America. So every ride you make with them, they charge you a steroid defeat. That's climate trade. So basically, every every ride that you make with them, we calculate real time the co2 of that, right, we you pay a sustainability fee. And then we issue a certificate for you as Justin Goldston for your ride with a co2 and how much money you paid into which product is going. Last year, it was a, it was like more than 300,000 transactions of certificates coming from that. And that's only for b2b. Now, it's we are doing it for every single transaction of Canada. We did same thing with Santander Bank for credit cards. So now with MasterCard and Santander we made a project where it is already live in Spain, now to Portugal and to to Brazil. And worldwide. When you pay with your credit card, we calculate the payments with your credit card, and you can offset it. You can offset the same thing with gas stations when you refuel your car, same thing for cargo, shipping, transportation, any any other sector that you may imagine. And that's why Shannon is targeting the airline sector. We provide transparency and traceability through the API to all the airline commerce

08:19
entries. Interesting. So,

08:21
so you got some that's got some interesting stuff going on. So what So what type of response have you been receiving from, from businesses, from consumers? And if possible, you know, what, what type of feedback have you been receiving from policymakers,

08:42
you know, on this solution? Well,

08:46
okay, going for different users in b2b is been some very strong work of evangelism evangelizing from the beginning. So we started in 2018. But our first customers are starting in 2019. Within the start in the best country, like Spain, it was not the like the most mature market France was more advanced in sustainability, Nordic countries Germany, but we lead the way of transport led the transformation in Spain towards sustainability companies that now they change the narrative in the market, like companies understand better sustainability, they have some regulations going on in Europe, as you know, they are like reporting regulations and all that. So companies are open to do this, they have targets of becoming net zero before 2050. So they have to offset they have to buy this project. So what we provide is a tool, you know, the two year offset but offset generating positive impact, which is what I am trying to pursue, right. I don't want you to make greenwashing of what you're doing I mean, I want you to generate impact on what you're wanting the money you understand. So companies are very receptive. And now we want To do the same we did in Spain and in the other countries we are present like we just acquired. We just enter in a new market in Germany, Switzerland, in Austria, the dark region, and we reincorporate, we are just Corporation now. So we are, like growing and building our forts in the country. And so that from the perspective of b2b b2c, as you were saying before, he needs to be a little bit more educated on why to buy offset, because there is a lot of misunderstanding, there is a lot of not ignorance, but not too much knowledge on why they are officers needed. I mean, and I always put the same example if we as as three, we go, and we reforest, we make a reforestation, we have to put our money right at work. If we go to the bank, the bank is gonna say, how are you going to pay me back? Are you going to sell the booth of the trees? How are you going to pay me back. And that's why the carbon markets are so good, because that's a collateral that you can use to fund your project. And then you receive money for doing good for the planet. That's, that's the beauty of the carbon markets. That's why they should be useful if you do it properly, because there are people that obviously like in any market in any business, they do bravery. We saw in the TV in the news people, conservation areas that didn't need to be conservative, there was a hunting area of a friend, there was a say, I'm not going to make a little bit of money here because I have these trees that do not under any threads. And they just started to generate resolve that. So that's why new tools new blockchain is important for these because provides transparency, and new tools are coming to say this proof is generous current praise, but is generous current grades, because so because it generates impact. And that's why the end user needs to be educated. I agree. And I think that the mindset of all of us has changed a little bit more after COVID. So people, I don't think there are too many, I mean, the percentage of deniers of climate change are being reduced are coming down every time more. Because I think that we all know that something is wrong, right? And, and, and at least what we want to say, let's do something about it right? Every time more. And if I can round up my food chains. When I buy something, and I put that money towards the climate. That's not to paint too much paint for me. And I'm doing I'm doing a good thing for the planet. And institutionally as the third party we're asking, in terms of the institutional and the governments and all that we've been having a lot, we have a lot of good acceptance by governments, especially in Latin America, where we closed an agreement with 35 countries to generate regenerative agriculture projects. So we are working with an organization called ICA, which is a sequel for agriculture. So we will be issuing carbon credits for regenerative agriculture, for rice for cocoa, coffee and for cocoa in the coming years. And we are doing prayers also to because we don't want to be only like the the trader or like the marketplace where to trade, we want to pause projects that need funding at the origin. Because maybe they don't have the money to generate the carbon for this to be sold. And later, they need to find you and usually so climate trade you can impose and you can invest employees that are in the initial stages, as well.

13:28
Very interesting. So So do you think so?

13:33
You know, that's my thought. It's my thought that, you know, if we educate the consumers of the importance of this, you know, they're going to provide additional pressure for these organizations to use to use solutions, such as carbon trade, climate trade,

13:50
because the consumers aren't going to be the users

13:57
of a lot of these a lot of these solutions like carbon offsets and things like that is going to be the organization's but the consumers are going to be the drivers to force organizations to do it right. Now, so what's your what's your thoughts on that?

14:13
No, look, I think that there are companies that are doing great on up play applying, like their solutions to the to the end users and I proved yourself the other day I was we work with three companies that provide plastic, they get out of the ocean, and they call it plastic prints, but they don't leave they just don't sell the plastic credit they use that plastic making products. So they are making furniture, they are making like like tables, they are making like benches, they are making chairs, they are making different things with that plastic coming out of the ocean. You buy the carbon UI, the plastic credit, but then the company is using it to produce products, which is great, right? So there's a whole Circular Economy. So we want to try to do something similar with the carbon credits here, right? So imagine at this point, there are different initiatives. And I put you, for example, the other day, we were talking about a, I was my runner, so I want to normally use, I was using Nike shoes. And I went the other day and say, well, lately, they're not that comfortable, I need to maybe change and I went to the store, and I saw that Adidas, were all made with plastic out of the ocean. And they were really looking very nice, super comfortable, and at the same time was plastic of the ocean, boom, I change brands like that. So Nike, now has two or other brands are gonna say, Okay, I need to follow this trend. So we are changing with our like consumers changing the way that the market works in the decision, because they are prosumers they are not consumers, they are prosumers. Now they decide they they make the companies to to make decisions based on that right. So I think it's really relevant that that we put all connected like that see require economy in our in that something is happening?

16:20
Yes, ESP is created journal article title from a prosumers. I like that. That one that was pretty awesome. That was pretty awesome.

16:29
So So you know, what? So

16:33
based on what you've seen, based on what you've seen, what do you think will be some of the some of the drawbacks and challenges for the tracking and tracing of, you know, carbon, and let me let me back up backup and backup and backup. So going back to going back to what you said about about the issues and how we can use carbon. Deborah doe, in a previous interview said that, you know, some organizations are in the early stages of capturing carbon on trucks and create those, you know, carbon blocks is expensive now, but they're just trying to just gauge it out, like carbon blocks, and they're gonna take that carbon that trap carbon, and they start to build buildings with it. Right? Right. Yes, it might be three or four years for that, but and we're in early stages now to track all that carbon from all these trucks and do that. So that's just one thing, you know, as compared to the shoes.

17:19
Would you? Go ahead, sorry.

17:22
Oh, but no, go ahead. Go ahead. response. I have a question after that. I

17:27
know, look, we are working with a company coming from the MIT friend of mine who is an MIT under 35. He created a carbon capture solution with micro algae is patented. So he modified genetically the algae, so it keeps the co2 nitrogen and suspended particles. suspended particles are more important even imagine a methane you know, small contaminant, that co2 suspended particles are some of the causes of the biggest health problems in the series, right? Because it's what you breathe. So these trees capture co2, like 365 natural trees, you put them in the industry, it's in the places that you cannot put the trees. And then you get the tubes out of microbiology, there is a reactor that makes brings the air through that the algae makes the process of photosynthesis, it grows. And every three months, you take off the tubes, you take the algae, and you'd make compost for the plants. So imagine I mean, there are processes like in New York, people don't know New York City has a program that is forcing every restaurant, the rest of the food has to go to a program that they pick up every day, and they make compost for the plants for farmers. How much waste do we throw out of the restaurants in Miami, in Florida and everywhere? That goes to generate methane emissions in a big scale? Amazing, no. So what our why don't we get that good practices, and we get solutions that can be circular economy for all of us. And that's something else. So we the algae is another another thing, but imagine what they're doing now with him is a super catch carbon capture in plant that we are working on a new methodology for that. And you get the head and you can create hempcrete you can build hempcrete for the houses, you know. So I mean, there are whole a lot of things like the co2 You were talking about. No, I mean, that's that's exactly the type of things that we have to be doing.

19:34
All right. Yeah.

19:35
Thanks for that. I have a I have an hour and a half to discussion on those types of things. But what are what I would say my last question would be, you know, what are the drawbacks and challenges to tracking to tracking carbon emissions carbon offsets carbon credits on the blockchain based on what you've seen, given that you all have, you know, began this process began this journey.

19:58
Okay, that's that's, that's a that's A good one and a complicated one. But to go in deep, but basically, you know, we have a lot of IoT devices that are coming out different satellites, drones, and let's say tools to analyze the, the soil in different components. So I mean, at the end, we have the good part we have a lot of electronics and are often Knology that we can connect to each other. We have digital MRB, we build the first digital MRB worldwide and last year, the same time than other days. A good friend of us is doing a great job on the general RV. We created one we connected to a registry, we include a certification combiner middle and we created real time carbohydrates from solar, it was a POC, because but we did it with solar plant because you had a smart metering there, we created real time carbon credits, we certify we register them, we bring them so on primer three, they were they were sold in immediately and canceled in the registry and issued the certificate. So there are a the beauty of these is everything was blockchain traced the whole process. Since since generation from the smart from the plant, it was a solar plant in a lake in Spain. So we got all the data from the regenerating carbon plate everything in real time. And it was sold in real time at the same time. So what I'm trying to say there are tools that we can use the challenges that you are that you're mentioning, is like how do you make that repeatable? Right? Because, as you know, Blockchain is great. But I mean, the data that you put in blockchain, it has to be reliable, it has to be portable, right? Because if you put a data, there's no reputable. Yeah, it is public, but it's not good data. So the good source of data for for for for being in the blockchain, it is if it comes from a device, or something that is providing good data at the end, right? So if you have a smart metering in a solar plant approved by the state, government, county, whatever it is, that is has that the Smart Metering has all the technical approvals and certifications of the market. Why do I have to doubt of that data that is smart metering is providing? Then if I put that data in, in blockchain, that data is correct. I don't need someone to go to test it because it was tested before making the solar plan. Right. So the data is accurate. That's the type of data it so that's the type of challenges who is one who is the one that is deciding which data is good, which data is not great. So it has to be the technology, the IoT devices and all that that we are using. But there has to be some frameworks or at least some guidance, some guides from organizations. That's why come up different organizations like reporting, who tells how to report is it the government, now there is Task Force worldwide this year, the FCD telling Task Force for climate disclosure, that they say, okay, or CDP carbon, because they have to, it has to be like this, and people will start to use the same way of reporting. Now, they come by at some point, the government will tell you it has to be like this now, like the European Union, for example, you have to audit all their regulation. But yeah, I mean, we need that because if not you and I, we can go and say, Okay, I'm putting this data, it is accurate, because I say so no, I mean, you cannot be judging parts. Right? You have to be one thing or another, right? Yeah,

23:44
no, have you if I

23:45
explain myself?

23:47
You did, and like, so that was one? That's the one question that I've had for a very long time. How long do you think is gonna take? Well, we do have one? Yes, we do have standards. You know, we Yes, we do have frameworks. But how long do you think it's going to take until we have one standard for all these standards come together? And say, okay, yeah, this is the one we're all gonna go with.

24:11
It won't be one a standard in my opinion. I mean, I think that it will be a Well, under standard of process. With the minimums, of course. I mean, that's why the task force for voluntary markets it was created. So the CCPs I mean, they are trying to bring up like a whole let's say, come on. Process Come on, rules for everyone to use. So more and more standards are coming before you were five. There were five now more coming to the ground and more technologies, generating carbon credits, and they don't have any standard they have just the blockchain but it is certified by someone. But it is not a standard. It is an A standard of process right how to guides the guides. somehow to proceed with that. So I think that will be minimums to be reputable. And whenever you you follow that, and you are you have that minimums of, of what a carbon credit has to be. Yeah, I mean, that can take, I mean, we are already working on that there are a lot of initiatives. So I wouldn't I wouldn't say a number of years. But I mean, there are already carbon credits being generated that doesn't have any standard behind it. Just pure in blockchain. Right. You mean generated from the source? We did it last year, and there was not understand that behind was a certification company, but it was all electronically made. Right. So yeah.

25:44
Excellent. So yeah, that was that's all that's really all the questions that I had, um, do you have anything else that you would want to add, you want to let people know about, about about climate trade?

25:58
While I mean, that we are super excited to to be now growing and accessing the US market with all the corporations here, helping them to understand like that, I mean, not only this about like, offsetting is not something boring, and that they have to do because they have to do it is something that can generate a positive impact then be something very good for their organizations, in terms of supporting projects. And at the same time, at the same time, the consumers are going to be the ones that are going to be valuing a lot that that the force that they are doing now. So we will provide all our expertise and our technology for the companies to be able to do something that matter for the planet.

26:45
Excellent.

26:46
Excellent. So thank you all once again, Chief Chief and framework can everybody find you?

26:54
So, yeah,

26:56
I'm, I'm located on Florida, in Florida. But anybody that's interested in meeting with me, and I'm meeting with as many aviation folks from airlines and aerospace and airports, as I can between now and the aviation festival in Miami, that's coming up in a couple of months. So trying to set up as many meetings as possible, please email me, I'm Shannon dot cherry at climate trade.com That's sh A N N o n.ch, e r r EY at climate trade.com and or find me on LinkedIn and I'd love to connect with you and, and friend as well.

27:44
Likewise, likewise, in my case, I'm in Florida as well. It looks like we are in the birthplace here but now we are in

27:53
and but like my emails from dot Benedito A, B E and EDI to at climate trade COMM And also in in in LinkedIn is like good way also to find me and yeah to look at the marketplace as I told before market dot climate free.com and let us know any any concern with any sector, any doubt any, any concern that you have and how you can bring your company in the right way towards sustainability.

28:23
Alright, thanks a lot for

28:27
that. And I do just yeah, I'll try to include all that information within within the within the description and the comments on this video. And I once again, thank you, everybody, and until next time.

VeChain Foundation Climate Research - Justin Goldston Interviews Daniel Krupka of Coin Bureau
Video Link - https://youtu.be/GHhNak2dhjg

Yeah, so my name is Daniel, I'm the Head of Research at the coin Bureau are the largest YouTube channel about cryptocurrency, you can think of me as kind of being the back end to guys front end, for simplicity's sake. And yeah, and yeah, that's it.

00:29
All right, I like it short and sweet. So So, um, we briefly talked about this interview, talked about the work we're doing, we're doing with V chain to, to understand among among industry leaders as to the desirability and feasibility of tracking carbon credits, carbon offsets carbon emissions on the blockchain, as well, as you know, this whole this whole emerging topic of refi. So So can you, you know, begin to to give give your thoughts on on any one of those topics or all of those topics?

01:08
Yeah, sounds good. So, I don't know. I mean, I imagine if the viewers are, you know, if they know v chain, chances are they know the coin bureau. But we did a video about carbon credits, I think it was a couple months back, and I did the research for that one. So I do actually have quite quite a bit to say there. I guess I'll start by saying that my biggest concern about carbon credits in general, is basically Well, one is that there are no kind of like global standards, I think that something has been raised many times as well. There's kind of like a global standard for what counts, you know, what, what? I don't know, like, how many how many trees needs to be planted for it to count as one, you know, as one kilogram of co2? or what have you. That's been removed from from the atmosphere. So one is the absence of standards. The second issue is kind of, well, basically, that a lot of these carbon credits, I mean, to, I'm not going to use any explicit language here, but let's just say that they're they're just, they're just scams, basically, you're selling it like, again, because there is no, because there are no standards, because there's, there seems to be, there seems to be lacking regulation, that you basically have, you know, people that are saying, you know, yeah, of course, like, you know, here you can, I don't know, here's a carbon credit that I'm just going to sell to you, because of this piece of land that I have, and I'm gonna, I'm gonna keep it nice and safe. But you know, they were never planning on building out in any way. And, you know, they basically have all this money coming in. And it's yeah, there was an article that I'd sent you, Justin from The Guardian recently, something like 97% of carbon credits issued by like the largest carbon credit issuer, basically, they actually don't reduce carbon. Now, there's been lots of concerns that even the whole scheme of carbon credits, basically, like, incentivizes because it's like you, you don't actually reduce any emissions, you just, you just pay, you just ask people to pay for it. And, and if that money is not used wisely, then in the end, all you're doing is just, you're just creating basically another speculative market, which, you know, to be honest, this is this is kind of what I, what I think a lot of these refi projects are kind of doing is they're, they're trying to tap into the speculative aspect of, you know, the carbon credits market where, you know, it's, if you think about it, at least again, and I'm happy to be corrected on this, if either you just didn't know or if someone you know, feel free to reach out or reach out to me on on LinkedIn, or Twitter or what have you. But my understanding of carbon credit markets is that obviously, the goal is to reduce carbon. So that means that every single year, the amount of carbon credits that can be issued is reduced. And if you just simple supply, and demand dynamics tells you that the price of this carbon credits are gonna go up over time. So this is this is, you know, there therein lies the speculative aspect, you're basically it's literally like investing like another kind of like, like Bitcoin. But the problem is that this Bitcoin that we're talking about, is not transparent, at least again, like I'm not talking about the blockchain part, I'm talking about the actual issuance of carbon credits, the actual issue, issuance of carbon credits, is not transparent. You can't really verify anything that's going on. And the bigger issue is that if you if you do end up in a scenario, and this is, you know, this touches on a bigger issue, if you do end up having global standards, and I know that I think the United Nations is working on like a global carbon credit system or something like this, but if you end up with a centralized authority that takes control of the whole carbon credits, then what you're investing in when you're buying, you know, like, either with weather, I mean, I don't want to name any names, but from any of these real life projects, when you buy these tokenized carbon credits, you're basically you're basically buying kind of like a stable coin that has properties that are similar to Bitcoin, if that makes any sense, where the issuing authority behind those carbon credits could anytime they can see that, you know, one of these refi projects for whatever reason, we don't like what they're doing, so we're no longer gonna issue carbon credits to them. And all of a sudden the value of those tokens goes to nothing. And this is again, this is a an issue where when you get a headline saying that 97% of the carbon credits from this particular issue, were faulty and don't reduce carbon, then what does that do to the price of the tokenized version of that asset? Right like what you see it's the equivalent of if someone said, hey, the reserves for you know one of the largest stable coins has been seized or is not imagined someone came and said 97 For percent of the reserves for tether, you know, which some would say is the case, but I don't think it is. But let's just say for sake of argument, if 97% of the reserves for tether were actually worthless, then what would happen to the price of USD T, obviously, it would go down. And that's, you know, that's obviously a financial risk, there's a huge risk to the protocols that are otherwise doing really good work. So that's, that's kind of like, I guess, a couple thoughts there. The other thing that I'll throw out, and then I'll let you jump in there, just because, you know, I can keep going forever. But the other thing that I'll mention, is that, you know, do when it comes to this issue, and I guess, and trading of carbon credits, is that something that, you know, specific people actually want to be transparent? Do people actually want to know, do these institutions actually want to know, are these institutions want you to be able to see how many carbon credits they hold? Do they want you to see when they're moving carbon credits around, there's a case to be made, the institutions don't want that. And it's my personal belief that, you know, as much as privacy has been, you know, the, the the kind of black sheep of the crypto industry, ultimately, it's going to be the institutions, the central banks, the governments, you know, when when, when central banks start buying cryptocurrency in 2025, they're going to start calling for some privacy protections, because they don't want you to be able to see how much Bitcoin certain central bank holds. And I think that you already saw the, I guess, to go on a little bit of a tangent, but you're already kind of seeing this with the, we already saw this with a tap root upgrade, which, you know, like tap root, whatever it's, it sounds like it's nothing. But in short, what tap root did for Bitcoin is it made all the transactions appear the same, whether it's a multisig, whether it's going and joining the Lightning Network, whether it's a atomic swap, and all of a sudden, you've created actually, when you have a separate layer, you can now interact with different layers of Bitcoin with some degree of privacy. And I imagine we're gonna see something similar with the carbon credits, where they're probably going to end up migrating to sort of layer two, that's going to be specifically for refi. And maybe I'm making a big prediction now. But But I think I think that, you know, similarly to NF T's, I think the biggest opportunity in Rifai is going to be actually whatever base layer is powering these tokens, and I do think it's going to be a layer two, I mean, it could be a layer one, but I have a feeling it's going to be a layer two that's on something like Aetherium because, again, institutions want security more than anything else. And the most secure blockchains you know, for better or for worse for the time being are Bitcoin and Aetherium. So so this is kind of I guess we're anyway, I could keep going on the tangent, but I hope you have some some interesting thoughts there.

07:14
No, you actually, yeah, I got about four, I got about four bullets here. But you bring up an excellent point in terms of in terms of privacy, in that, you know, I come I come from a supply chain industry, right. And whenever I whenever I asked, you know, leaders of organizations, you know, about blockchain, you know, there's their primary concern, the privacy, we don't want to our our data, our data is our competitive advantage, and all these things like that. So you make an excellent point, you make an excellent point when you talk about the whole privacy piece. And that's one that's one thing. That's one thing I talk about a lot. And that I think that zero knowledge proofs, once it once the enterprise has come in, I think zero knowledge proofs are going to be massive. I think that your knowledge proofs are going to that. I think zero knowledge proofs are going to be the thing that solution, that tool that kind of gets in gets these organizations and to the blockchain space, right? Because once they know what it now it's gonna take, it's gonna take someone like you all to kind of create the education so that they understand it. Right. But But once they once they get to that once they get to education, once they get to that point, then they'll understand that that that zero knowledge proofs may may provide, you know, the privacy that you know, they're they're concerned about, which which turns a lot of these organizations away, you know, from from blockchain, because they think the guest Yes, is transparent right. Now. Going back to everything you said. If we include zero knowledge proofs, do you think that do you think that blockchain could be a viable solution to kind of, to kind of alleviate some of your concerns that you that you spoke about?

09:10
Yeah, I mean, I think so. But again, the my bigger concern, I guess, and I probably should emphasize a little bit more as my I mean, I guess I didn't really mention it. But my biggest concern, in general with carbon credits is kind of, you know, again, the goal, again, is to reduce carbon, which you could make the argument, you know, whether reducing carbon all the way down to zero is something that you necessarily want to do in an economy. That's, you know, that's that's a debate that can be had. But not only that, but what kind of is what I'm really concerned about when it comes to whether it's tokenized or not. What I'm concerned about is the incentive that the whole carbon credit scheme is going to create because again, if you like, right now, at least my understanding, and again, feel free to correct me or anyone can correct me here, but carbon credits are restricted, I think, and Justin, you had mentioned this, I think before we started speaking that carbon credits are really right now more geared towards institutional use, and that but this is something that is because I guess at least in Europe, for example, like institutions, basically, they have to buy carbon credits to offset, you know, some x amounts. And each year, the European Union reduces the amount of carbon credits that are available, because of course, they're trying to reduce the carbon emissions. But the but so you know, that's all well and good. But what happens when you start to apply this to, let's say, two people, where you actually do introduce, like an individual carbon credit score, which is kind of like the more dystopian element of what we had mentioned in our video, where, basically every year the government or whoever would give you X amount of carbon credits that you can spend, and then what happens to people who are, you know, less fortunate, who are, you know, historically, you could say, like Mark marginalized, where they're basically forced to, you know, basically, to not consume any carbon whatsoever, and basically, in some cases, probably literally almost killed themselves to to not use any carbon so that they can sell it for money so that they continue to survive. And each year that that amount gets smaller and smaller. Meanwhile, the rich folks who have the closest connections to the organizations that are going to be issuing these carbon credits, whether it's the government, whether it's the United Nations, the individual, it'll be literally the same thing that we have today with with fiat money, where the people who are have the closest connections to the commercial banks and the central banks, they can borrow directly at a rate that no one else can, and then they buy up all the assets, and then they use those assets as collateral to borrow even more. And if they default, when the government bails them out, and we're gonna see the exact same thing, in my opinion, if we go down this path, we're gonna see the exact same thing happened with carbon credits, where at the beginning, it's I think, it's actually gonna be really good. But then over time, you're gonna see these really perverse incentives evolve the same way they did in the traditional financial system. And you're basically going to see all these institutions just getting richer and richer, because they have the closest connections to the issuance of these, the issuers of these carbon credits. I personally think that the best thing that blockchain could do as zero knowledge proofs or not, whether it's the biggest thing that Rifai could do is find some way of in a decentralized way, issuing decentralized carbon credits that do not require a centralized issuer, where you can actually have verifiable proof that yes, this this carbon was reduced, you could potentially do this, you know, using peer to peer networks, something like helium, where you can set up sensors, and you can show proof of, you know, things like, you know, you can really get some really interesting ideas. But in my personal opinion, there's two ways that refi can go either refi can decide that they're basically going to be a stable coin issuer, that of a stable, an issuer of an asset that, you know, is going to have the same perverse incentives as a fiat currency, and they'll get rich in the process. But if they roll that central bank, digital currencies, then all the money they make will be worthless anyway, but that's a topic for another time. But but, you know, either they can go that path, or they can decide, you know, what, we're going to do things differently, instead of, instead of integrating with the existing system, we're going to disrupt it, we're going to make some sort of decentralized carbon credit, that can be verified by anyone that anyone can issue where I can basically prove and be like, you know, look, this, you know, this month or this week, I, you know, I traveled less, or I consumed less, and you can prove that to the blockchain, and the blockchain will reward you with a carbon credit. And you don't have to go to some centralized issuer and you won't have the same perverse dynamics. Come on. That's, that's kind of my my thoughts there. But anyway, I hope I hope that made a little bit of sense there.

13:03
Oh, yeah, it did. It did. And kind of I'm gonna try, I'm gonna try. I'm gonna try. I'm gonna try it a little, a little guy saying, right, so. So what you're telling me is, Chris, maybe a new gold?

13:23
Yeah, well, if they're done if they're done correctly, yeah, I mean, 100%. It's like, if you can, if you can make, and again, it does beg the question of, you know, whether whether reducing carbon and like, how much carbon do you actually want to reduce, you actually want to go all the way to zero? Because if you go all the way to zero with no alternative energy source, or what have you, you're gonna be in a lot of trouble. You're gonna end up like Sri Lanka, you're gonna end up like, you know, I don't know, South Africa is maybe not a good example right now. But Sri Lanka is definitely a good example there. You don't want to, you know, you have to almost you have to question the whole basis of the scheme itself, where you know, it, and again, sorry to go on the tangent, Justin, but I think it's something that's worth noting something potentially that, you know, Rifai could also potentially address. But take a second to consider that the whole reason why we have all these, like, the whole purpose of carbon credits is is to you know, is to reduce the damage on the or I guess, lower the damage that humans are doing to the environment, basically. But if you really think about it, the whole reason why we have all this damage to the environment is because of overconsumption and overconsumption comes from the incentive in an inflationary currencies that are losing value, there's an incentive to spend, if you had a currency that actually held its value over time, then you would be incentivized to save rather than spend, you would only spend on the absolute necessities consumption would come down naturally, you wouldn't have to pass a single law. And and all this, you know, this, this natural reduction in consumption just from this chain, the small change in incentives for making a monetary system that can be inflated that's constantly inflationary versus one that is actually deflationary. And, of course, the you know, the powerful people don't want a deflationary system, because deflation makes debt more expensive and all these governments and corporations have a bunch of debt, but if you actually want to solve climate change and all these things that that all these reflagged projects ultimately want to do, then the way you do that is by creating a hard money system, a sound money system where there's deflation, that incentivizes people to spend rather than save, that reduces the overconsumption. And you can have a planet with, you know, five or 10 times potentially 10 times more people, and it'd be completely fine. Why? Because the average person would only consume what they absolutely need to which at the end of the day, this is what carbon credits are supposed to do to they're incentivizing people not to consume less, but you don't have to create this huge centralized crazy scheme, all you have to do is change the money, and that'll fix so many issues, whether it's wealth inequality, and what and all these things, I truly believe because all that will happen is all these again, like, my mother is Colombian. Okay, so I like I my background, you know, there's there's real poverty in places like Colombia and Latin America. And, and a lot of it comes from the fact that the, you know, at least in places, let's say, like El Salvador, where they use a foreign currency that's constantly being inflated, and they just have no chance. And anyway, I guess it's, uh, yeah, I apologies for the tangent there. But I feel free to bring us back on track there, just

15:59
keep the tangents because that's, that's how that's how I get nuggets. Whenever people start start talking about things that are passionate about, that's where that's where nuggets come from. Right. So. So whenever you're whenever you want to open up when on your last run, whenever you were on your last Bull Run, right, I wrote down, I wrote down. So, you know, we say that it's hard to kind of validate some of these claims that these organizations are saying in terms of carbon credits, and I had a call, I like to call with uma with uma yesterday, yesterday about their optimistic Oracle. Right. So although although, you know, they're using their Oracle primarily for prediction markets, do you see a place for for or a need for Oracle's within within the sustainability space? And for 100%?

16:56
Yeah, 100% I mean, whether whether we're talking carbon credits, or NF T's, or what have you, the name of the game is going to be infrastructure. So you're gonna need like you said, you're gonna need an Oracle, you're gonna need somewhere to store the data, you know, who has what, because, you know, unfortunately, these blockchains, some of these block chains are becoming very big actually, recall. And again, V chain community feel free to grill me. But I remember last time, when we had updated, done an update on the project, what V chain developers were actually concerned, they had mentioned an injury, that they're concerned that the blockchain is becoming too large, too quickly. And this is what happens to every single crypto project that has a fast transaction speed, because what happens is basically you're creating the size of the blockchain just grows, you know, I guess you could say, like, like, just very quickly, I was gonna say exponentially. But that's not technically correct. But in any case, you know, decentralized data storage, it would be really interesting, I think, again, from Rifai in this niche, whether it's V chain or otherwise, to think like, is it possible, like you were saying to create, even potentially, like an Oracle that's specifically designed for carbon credits? Is it possible to create a data store a decentralized data storage solution that is specifically for the storage of tokenized carbon, or the storage of transaction history of tokenized carbon credits, you know, to to because again, like, and this ties into, you know, Justin, you may or may not be familiar with, with Cosmos, where the idea behind cosmos is that every single application is eventually going to need to need its own blockchain, because it's gonna have too much adoption. I think that the same thing applies to infrastructure, where, you know, everyone assumes oh, we're gonna use chain link, but no, and like, you know, everyone's gonna use chain like, and there's no room for competition, that's, I'm sorry, but that's BS, what's gonna happen is that over time, there's gonna be so much data, there's gonna be so much demand for infrastructure that you're going to need, you're going to need an ummah with this optimistic. With this optimistic Oracle, you're going to need some, you're going to need probably dozens, probably hundreds of Oracle's, and you're going to and, you know, rather than just having a chain for each DAP, someday, you might actually need a decentralized storage solution, and an Oracle, and all these other, you know, node hosting services, stuff like an anchor, and, and these projects, which escaped me now, but, you know, you're like, the potential and refi in my again, in my opinion, comes fundamentally from the building of infrastructure, IT projects can build infrastructure and focus less, less so on tokenizing, like, as anyone like tokenizing, the carbon credit, that's the easy part, that's the get rich, quick and fast part. If you want something that's gonna, that's gonna last and something that's actually going to have use, then creating a custom Oracle for refi creating a custom or decentralized data storage solution and what have you, that I think that's where the potential is, and I'm not sure if that's something that humans seeking to address, but, but that's something potentially looking at worth looking into as a refi project. Yeah,

19:35
I like that one. I love I love that one. Yeah, so yeah. So any, anything anything else? We covered? We covered? We covered a lot, we've covered a lot. Um, I want to come in and transcribe and transcribe this interview. This was this was a good one. Do you have anything else you wanted to add in terms of you know, how we can bring how we can actually leverage blockchain to Have to assist in this sustainability effort that everybody talks about. Because, you know, when we're talking about sustainability, I've been in this space a lot, I've created, I created a, I created a course for for University of Southern California for their new sustainability program. And over the last couple of years, it's just a lot of talk in terms of sustainability in terms of reducing, you know, reducing carbon emission becoming carbon negative and things like that, you know, so something I'm very passionate about. And again, I came, I come from an industry. So I know, I know, a lot of this stuff is just talk. So I think that maybe maybe I'm just being too optimistic, where I'm saying, if we, if you're saying you're gonna do it, put on the blockchain and prove it. Right. You know, so that's always kind of been my mantra. So, you know, do you have anything else to add to or any other thoughts to how we can leverage this and it doesn't have to be blockchain, how we can leverage technology to kind of move more toward this, this this, this this vision that we all that we all look to, to?

21:13
Well, I don't know if you know this, Justin, but this is Alana, the founder of Salon Argus creator of Salon, I know, there's technically co founders, whatever, and a totally echo CO is actually also really passionate about addressing environmental issues through blockchain and cryptocurrency and I think he mentioned in the interview once that, you know, if he wasn't doing Solana, then he would be trying to do something basically unrefined. And what's what's really fascinating to me is that I think that there's potential, again, like, the crypto industry, and I guess this relates to another discussion that we had earlier. But the crypto industry, I think, has to has to think less about trying to integrate with existing because, again, like you were saying, like the existing systems of addressing things like sustainability, it's mostly talk and not much gets done. why would why anyone would want to integrate with such a system. And again, of course, the reason why they want to integrate is because they want to make money quickly, because there's all these, you know, government spending programs or whatever they're going towards the sector so that people can get paid to basically sit around and talk and do nothing. But I mean, I hope that that's not coming off as too aggressive. But if you if you if you were to change, I guess like again, don't don't the crypto industry can't think of like going in and integrating with the existing system. I truly believe that the whole point of crypto is to create alternatives that will actually disrupt and address these issues. So when it comes to something like sustainability, I do think that there is a potential for you know, for for a crypto project, whether it's a blocked whether it's refi or what have you even something a great example actually, which you may or may not may not have heard about is something like algoryn where on the Algren blockchain, the validators actually don't earn any block rewards. And so these are transaction fees. So what happens to these transaction fees is they basically get sent to like a random wallet address, and they just sit there and they do nothing. And what the algorithm Foundation decided, or I don't know Algren community, and I don't want to put words in their mouth, but what they decided to do was to use these transaction fees to actually buy carbon credits to make the auger and blockchain carbon neutral, which is, you know, a clever way of doing it. But now imagine, imagine a scenario where you could take a portion of transaction fees from something like Aetherium. And you could use that to build a solar farm or build a wind farm or ideally, build a nuclear power plant that is actually safe, because again, you know, everyone is, you know, really paranoid about nuclear, but you have to remember and Justin, you probably know this, that there was a huge breakthrough in Fusion recently, right? Yeah, fusion and fusion, nuclear, there's a huge breakthrough. And they're saying, Oh, it's gonna be it's gonna be 10 years before we see it, why you want you wanna know why because there's, there's all this regulation, there's all this red tape, there's too many people in rooms discussing how they're going to do it, whatever, what you If If fusion is known to be something that is safe to experiment with, which I don't know if it is, but let's just say for sake of argument that it is then you can have a cryptocurrency, you can have a Dao, you can have a refi Dao pool all this money together to create a fusion reactor in the next couple of years instead of in a couple of decades. And you could get started on on going to, you know, on reducing carbon emissions in like, you know, immediately and people forget one thing, sorry to go on tangent again, you're Justin. But one thing that people forget is that it's not just about the money, it's about the time, imagine if you were able to build a fusion reactor, you know, crowdfund the development of a fusion reactor with a cryptocurrency in two or three years. And then you have seven years of that of that fusion reactor, basically creating limitless amounts of energy versus waiting that extra seven years and then making it you don't I mean, the, the gains that would be had in those seven years leading up would just be so incredible for all of society. And so crypto has to stop thinking it's like, oh, how do we how do we backpack and get, you know, get more of this, like fiat money from these institutions that again, like, you know, in my opinion, that money is eventually going to be worth nothing anyway, you know, radical, radical thought. But you know, why not? Instead focus on why don't we crowdfund and build something. Why don't we build what just just build like a like a solar farm, buy some land and build a solar farm, buy some land, buy some land and build a wind farm, see how it works, and actually have some financial incentives. Why not make it that whoever buys energy from this wind farm arm that money goes to the people who have participated in the doubt or participate in the crowdfunding? Why the hell do we need all these energy companies? Why the hell do we need all these governments to say, You know what? No, of course there needs to be some regulation don't get me wrong. But why do we need all this complex infrastructure and bureaucracy? Like why not? Why don't you just crowd fund it and build it yourself and then have the profits come to the Dow and then you can use that money to build it and keep building and keep building and keep building until another fusion reactor and other solar and start building solar panels in space? Like all this, you know, reach out to Elon Elon loves Dogecoin? Why don't you make some solar panels send them up to space, you could crowd fund that, you know, of course, individually, we're all you know, each of us, you know, relative to the people who are really wealthy relative to the central bankers, for sure. Individually, we don't have much money. But if we pull together and we push that money in a certain direction, then what we can do, we can do it faster and better. And this is something that Anatoly sees and all these other guys see. And I imagine a lot of guys in the refi industry also see this, that if we can work collectively, collectively together, and on the same page, we can, whatever what the government's are kind of planning now, with all these green new deals or whatever, we can do it faster and better and more transparently, and everything through through blockchain, if we just stop focusing on trying to jump on that bandwagon is oh, I want money from the green new deal to you know, make your own green New Deal. Well, let's work together. Let's do it together. And let's have it done, you know, in a couple of years or a couple of months instead of like a decade, right? Anyway, I hope that's a good note to end on.

26:17
Yes, it is. Yes, it is. Alright, so that was the last note. But I have one more question. What do you think? What do you think are the future doubts? Because you brought it up? And you brought up a good point. And two, you brought up a good point in a good use case for Dalles. In my opinion, I don't I don't I don't think that that like that may gain traction because I've we're dealing with people here

26:39
right? We're still dealing with people. I don't think people will see there's enough money in it.

26:45
So like, case you mentioned may not may not have legs. And that's a perfect use case for it. So So So in your opinion, how far how far out? Do you think that we are away from and we're talking about this in the bear market? Right and a bull market? I say oh downs are the future. But now that we've seen what happened with these dowels, what are your thoughts on dowels and the future dowels.

27:12
In short, I think it's gonna sound pretty horrible. But I think that I think that unless we find a new governance structure, then all Dows are going to fail. I know that's a that's a bold prediction to make. But I want you to imagine because right now, the way that the way that dowsers are set up is that they're set up in kind of like a democratic process. And the democracy is that one token equals one vote, which is not a very good democracy, because of course, the wealthiest I don't know, if you saw this headline, I think is something like 97% or something like 3% of the token holders, and like 97% of the voting power, some have seen or 87%, some obscene imbalance in voting power. But even even if you were to do a system, which of course they're trying to develop now as to you know, you have like a decentralized digital ID where it's like one person equals one vote, you have a direct democracy the same way you do it, you know, in some countries, then you then you run into the same issue because where it Where are all the decisions in the United? Well, I guess the United States is a different situation, because you have states and all this stuff. But for sake of argument, it's like all the power in the United Kingdom is concentrated in London, all the power, most of the power in the United States is concentrated in Washington. So if you create Dows, with with, you know, democratic systems or totalitarian systems are a dictatorship, you're going to end up with, you're eventually going to end up with the same centralization and issues that we see today. So we not only have the decentralized, so Dows not only need to decentralize, you know, the participation, they need to decentralize the structure itself. Otherwise, you're just going to the, the, the, I guess, the process of Dao voting is inherently centralizing. And that is going to lead to failure over time, because you're gonna end up with with a group of people that have a lot of influence. And you saw this recently with a venture capitalist fighting back and forth. And so what I personally think needs to happen is we need to have a new governance structure. And I actually came up with one and I'll save that for another discussion, but I came up with a governance structure that is neither democratic nor, nor dictatorial, because those are kind of like the two extremes. But there is a way there is a middle ground that you can have, where you can have a new governance structure, and if Dows can implement something along those lines, then as long as like, again, the the whole purpose of an organization, if the organization has bad governance, then the organization is doomed to fail, the way that Git dowsers structure today, they are all doomed to fail. They're all doomed to fail. And I'm gonna say that with 100% boldness, so there needs to be a change on that front. Anyway, that's

29:28
that was That was excellent. That was a great, that was a great way to end in this conversation. So Daniel, thank you. Once again. Thank you once again, for all this. Can you let everybody know where they can find you?

29:40
Yeah, just find me on LinkedIn, Daniel Krupa. You can also follow me on Twitter, but there's some spicy stuff on there. So don't get offended. I mean, feel free to reach out and I want to have you and I'm a busy guy, but if you manage to get a hold of me, then consider yourself lucky.

29:55
Oh, and I can attest to that one. I can't test that one myself. All right. So Once again once again thank you thank you for taking the time and everyone else until next time thanks
